Authors
R.L. Strong
Number of Reviews
27

Title
Review for Deep Blue Sea (1999)
WARNER BROS. PRESENTS
IN ASSOCIATION WITH VILLAGE ROADSHOW PICTURES * GROUCHO II FILM PARTNERSHIP
AN ALAN RICHE * TONY LUDWIG/AKIVA GOLDSMAN PRODUCTION
A RENNY HARLIN FILM  
"DEEP BLUE SEA"  
SAFFRON BURROWS   THOMAS JANE LL COOL J   JACQUELINE McKENZIE  
MICHAEL RAPAPORT STELLAN SKARSGARD AND  SAMUEL L. JACKSON
MUSIC BY TREVOR RABIN  
CO-PRODUCER REBECCA SPIKINGS
EXECUTIVE PRODUCERS  DUNCAN HENDERSON AND BRUCE BERMAN
WRITTEN BY DUNCAN KENEDY AND DONNA POWERS & WAYNE POWERS
PRODUCED BY AKIVA GOLDSMAN  TONY LUDWIG  ALAN RICHE
DIRECTED BY RENNY HARLIN
What to do? What to do? You're trapped on an oceanic research facility
being chased by super intelligent sharks that you have created. Well,
in the movies the one thing you cannot do, is stay out of the
water. Renny Harlin's latest action thriller, "DEEP BLUE SEA" is an
enjoyable popcorn muncher. There's not weight to the film, but there
are enough solid jolts and action to keep this summer's audiences
satiated until the lines shorten for 'The Blair Witch Project'.
The story opens with two couples enjoying a nice catamaran ride off
the coast of Baja California. As the young people romance and cuddle,
a very large and toothy Mako shark rams their boat. As the kids are
plunged into the water, all seems lost until the shark is harpooned
and captured by Carter Blake (Thomas Jane).  We are then transported
to the boardroom of Russell Franklin (Samuel L.  Jackson),
multi-millionaire and head of a major corporation. Mr. Franklin is
ready to pull the plug on a secret research facility off the coast of
Baja, as a result of the shark escape. Brilliant biologist Susan
McAlester (Saffron Burrows) pleads with the powerful investor, claming
that her research will end with a cure for Alzheimer's disease.
Returning to the facility, McAlester shows Franklin the work being
done.  Franklin takes an interest in Blake, knowing the young man's
history and problems with the law. Again, he is unconvinced that the
project is viable, until he is brought to the lab.
In the lab, one of three altered sharks is caught and set up for
microsurgery. A small amount of fluid from the shark's brain case is
extracted and then mixed with inactive human brain cells. In a few
seconds, the cells start to come to life, proving Dr. McAlester's
theory. Unfortunately, the shark awakens and bites off the arm of one
of the other doctors. All this transpires as a tropical storm
approaches. As a rescue helicopter flies in to transport the injured
Scientist to the mainland, accidents happen causing the helicopter to
crash into the main radio tower of the facility. Amid much fire and
explosion, the science lab starts to flood, and the sharks see their
chance at some fresh food.
"Deep Blue Sea" is an enjoyable programmer. No classic by any means,
but a good solid piece of entertainment. As with most films of this
type, logic gives way to action and thrills. And 'Deep Blue Sea'
delivers some solid if silly thrills.  You know within the first
half-hour, which of the cast members are going to become shark
fodder. The film most closely resembles a 'Friday, the 13th' slasher
film, in that people are always walking into the wrong room at the
wrong time, and the only way out is the most perilous one. But the
film succeeds in giving the audience what it came to see, big sharks,
great to moderate visual effects, and a few good "jump out of your
seat" scares.
The performances are uniformly good, with LL Cool J, making the most
of his characterization. His 'Dudley', the cook of the facility has a
nice screen presence and his comical relationship between his pet
parrot, the sharks and the emergency at hand play very well. Thomas
Jane as Shark wrangler Carter Blake fills the requited hero role
adequately enough as he's not called upon to do much more with his
character. Saffron Burrows as Dr. McAlester fills the necessary
Sigorney Weaver part well enough (in one scene even disrobing a la
'Alien's Ripley). But to be honest, no one in the film has much of an
arc. The pace of the film doesn't call for in depth character study.
Renny Harlin has crafter a fine and enjoyable summer movie here. His
set ups and executions are as good as anything he's done before. There
are (surprisingly) little references to other films, at least
glaringly so. Most of the situations are lifted from other films, but
are executed with a nice wit and steady directorial hand. One
enjoyable sequence is wherein 'Dudley' is trapped in his own oven as
the kitchen floods. The super intelligent shark continually rams the
door of the oven and the controls finally succeeding in turning the
oven on to 500 degrees. This is a wonderfully creative and humorous
scene.
The script by DUNCAN KENEDY, DONNA POWERS and WAYNE POWERS is a fast
paced thrill ride. The lapses in logic and the curious lack of science
in the later half of the film doesn't derail the film as drastically
as it could. This is a chase film pure and simple.
The biggest problem with the film are it's special effects. While some
scenes are riveting in their visceral quality, others are just clearly
laughable in their execution. One scene in particular, wherein one
character is attacked by one of the sharks, it's massive bulk and
weight have no effect on the surrounding environment. This may not be
a big complaint, unless one notices that the shark actually seems to
cut right through a submersible vehicle as it attacks. But that goes
along well enough with the rest of the film.
"Deep Blue Sea" is won't win any grand accolades or awards. But for a
quick thrill ride on a Saturday night. You could find worse choices.
On a scale of 1 to 5, "Deep Blue Sea" rates a land lovin' 3. An
enjoyable escapist thriller from one our most maligned talents. This
film may give Renny Harlin the chance to do a really good film.
Here's hoping!
Copyright =A9 1999 R. L. Strong
Nothing in this article may be quoted or re-printed without the
expressed written permission of the author.
Visit the Dungeonmaster Cornucopia of Film
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Makeup/5594/reviews/main.html

Title
Review for Callejón de los milagros, El (1995)
DAVID MAZOR & JOHN LAWRENCE RÉ  PRESENT
AN ALFREDO RIPSTEIN  PRODUCTION IN ASSOCIATION WITH
ALAMEDA FILMS, IMCINE FONDO DE  FOMENTO A LA CALIDAD CINEMATOGRAFICA,
UNIVERSIDAD DE GUADALAJARA PRESENTS
"MIDAQ ALLEY" (El Callejón De Los Milagros)
staring ERNESTO GOMEZ CRUZ      SELMA HAYEK      MARIA ROJO
BRUNO BICHIR    DELIA CASANOVA      LUIS FELIPE TOVAR
MUSIC BY LUCIA ALVAREZ   CINEMATOGRAPHY BY CARLOS MARCOVICH
SOUND BY DAVID BAKSHT     EDITIED BY CARLOS SAVAGE
PRODUCTION COORDINATOR: DANIEL BERMAN RIPSTEIN
BASED ON THE NOVEL BY NAGUIB MAHFOUZ     SCREENPLAY BY VICENTE LENERO
PRODUCED BY ALFREDO RIPSTEIN, JR. & GERARDO BARRERA     DIRECTED BY JORGE
FONS
In Spanish with English Subtitles   approx. 140 minutes
Since the debut of W. Somerset Maugham's "Quartet", filmmakers have often
used the omnibus format of several tales to imbue a single idea or thought.
Such diverse films as the above mentioned title through Vincente Minnelli's
'Story of Three Loves' onto Quenten Tarentino's 'Pulp Fiction' have used
the multi-story approach to enhance their film. Jorge Fons' film adaptation
of Naguib Mahfouz's novel of a small poor neighborhood in Mexico is the
latest film to utilize the technique. And the end results are remarkably
satisfying.
                 "Midaq Alley" uses the multiple story frameworks in a way
to tell the complex stories of several characters. The script by Vicente
Lenero, expertly takes these individual stories, and combines them;
creating a marvelous whole, wherein any event from any of the three tales
could impact on the forth.  The film is actually broken up into four
distinct tales, three of which are introduced with the same game of
dominoes at a local tavern.
           The first tale is entitled 'Rutilio',  wherein we are introduced
to a middle aged man, Rutilio (Ernesto Gomez Cruz); owner of a small bar in
the town. He is a pitifully shallow man, oblivious to the thievery by his
employees, estranged by his wife and family and succumbing to his own
latent homosexuality. Rutilio's son, Chava dreams of running to America to
make his fortune. Relations become violently strained when Chava discovers
his Father having an affair with a younger man (Esteban Soberanes).
Attacking the young man and almost killing him, Chavo is forced to leave
Mexico, fearful of his Father's vengeance.
The second tale, 'Alma' gives us the story of Alma (Selma Hayek), a young
innocent girl in her mid twenties. She is the object of affection of Abel,
a young man who works as a barber in the town. As Alma and Abel date, Alma
is approached by Don Fidel (Claudio Obregón), an elderly businessman in
town; with a proposal of marriage. When Abel joins his friend, Chava (from
the previous tale) on his flight to the U.S., Alma agrees to the marriage
arrangement. But, Don Fidel passes away of a heart attack before the
wedding, leaving Alma ripe for the suave attentions of Jose Luis (Daniel
Giménez Cacho).
The third story, 'Susanita'; introduces us to the matronly landlord of a
small apartment in the  neighborhood. Her sad tale of loneliness and
despair is possibly the most riveting and heartfelt. Margarita Sanz plays
Susanita as a spinster longing for romance, longing for at the very least..
heartbreak. When she accidentally injures Güicho (Luis Felipe Tovar), she
immediately falls in love with the younger man. They marry, but the
marriage is a sham from the beginning as Güicho is only interested in
Susanita's money. The final tale, 'El Regreso' (The Return) ties up all of
the plot threads in a sad and effecting final act.
The film is nicely presented, without any flashy moves or tricks. The
camera work is modest but extremely effective, giving the film a glossy
look that belies its limited resources. The direction by Jorge Fons
concentrates on the performances, and there is not a false note among the
fine group. The standout performance is by Bruno Bichir as the lovelorn
Abel, who deftly shows both the heights of love and the depths of despair.
This is an actor to watch. Selma Hayek is wonderfully innocent as Alma. Her
child-like and playfully naive questioning of sex, to her final
transformation to a spiritually bankrupt call girl is quite possibly the
best performance of her career to date.
The most remarkable aspect of 'Midaq Alley' is that the film makes you love
and care for these diverse and desperate people. All of the inhabitants of
the neighborhood dream grand dreams, but all of them soon realize that the
dreams are well beyond their reach. Forgiveness is something that only God
can aspire to. It is only at the denouement, where Alma tries to save Abel
from himself that true forgiveness is granted. But to what end, the
filmmakers will not tell us. It is a wonderful morality tale of how life
circles and recreates itself.
                  "MIDAQ ALLEY" is a fine film, told from a point of view
that neither vindicates nor abdicates it's character's actions. These are
people we have all known, people we have all loved, people we have all
hated. In other words.. they are us.

Title
Review for Gamera 2: Region shurai (1996)
Directed by - Shusuke Kaneko
Writing credits - Kazunori Itô
Staring: Akiji Kobayashi, Ayako Fujitani, Miki Mizuno and Toshiyuki
Nagashima
Produced by Miyuki Nanri, Naoki Sato, Tsutomu Tsuchikawa
Cinematography by Junichi Tozawa  Film Editing by Shizuo Arakawa
Production Design by Hajime Oikawa
It stands fifty meters tall! It can fly up to speed of mach 3, and can
expel bursts of flaming plasma from its mouth. It is also.. a turtle.
That seemingly absurd description belays the marvelous construction of
the creature known in Japan as Gamera. Originally conceived by
Director Noriaki Yuasa back in 1965, Gamera was a protector of
children, defending his young fans from all sorts of ridiculous
creatures from space. One has only to envision a Ginsu knife walking
on four legs to appreciate (or deride) the silly concept on display in
these early films.
But that is not the case here. While those films made during the
1960's had budgets equal to a Roger Corman production, this new film
has much more generous bearing. While far from being a Special Effects
extravaganza, "Gamera 3: The Advent of Legion", is a remarkably
exciting and deft exercise in fantasy film making. One that both
hearkens back to a form of simplicity and extends and redefines those
techniques into something wholly new and wondrous.
A sequel to 1994's "Gamera, Guardian of the Universe", 'Gamera 2'
starts off with a unique approach in that Gamera is viewed by Japan as
a hazard that must be countered against. While varying political and
scientific groups grouse and argue amongst themselves, other events
transpire to bring about even more destruction to Japan and to Earth
itself.
A meteor shower occurs over Hokkaido. Yusuke Watase and Mr. Hanatani
from the Japan SDF science team are sent to investigate. They are met
by Midori Honami of the Youth Science Museum who finds the area bathed
in a strange blue light. Also discovered is an increases in oxygen in
the area (discovered when one soldier tries to light his cigarette).
Finding no sign of the meteor, the team is dumbfounded. Midori
exclaims, half jokingly that it seems as if the isotope has been
moved.
Situations develop. In Sapporo, communications are interrupted, the
fiber optics cables are being destroyed. A bottling company is robbed
of all of its bottles. Finally, the reason is discovered when the
underground subway system is attacked by a swarm of strange insects,
each over seven feet in length. The creatures consume the glass
windows, and lights, finally attacking the passengers. As the military
starts to devise an attack on the creatures, a huge plant erupts from
underground. Buildings crumble and crash as the plant sprouts up
growing in seconds to a height of 150 feet. The military starts to
destroy the plant as it starts to flower. It is found that the oxygen
levels in the city have increased to a level that any military attack
could level the city.
Suddenly, Gamera appears. The huge turtle topples the plant, crushing
it before it can eject its seeds. Gamera is attacked by a swarm of
insects which engulf the creature. Unable to defend itself, Gamera
collapses. The giant turtle is able to retreat when the insects
disengage from the leviathan to attack a nearby electrical plant.
Gamera takes flight, spinning like a flying saucer, it's blood
splashing against the buildings as it retreats.
It is discovered by the JSDF (Japanese Self Defense Force), that the
insects, now identified as Legion (named by a soldier in Sapporo based
on a biblical scripture), has a symbiotic relationship with the plant.
The plant can only live off of the waste product created by the
insects, and the insects can only survive in an oxygen rich
atmosphere. The insects are also a silicon based life form, their
basic diet consisting of silica and carbon. Identified as a threat to
life on the planet, the Japanese government enlists the aid of the
United Nations Defense Force in helping to find a defense against the
creatures.
This first act of the film (as well as the remainder) is marvelously
constructed. The suspense and tension of the film is enthralling. U.S.
film goers haven't seen a film like this in quite a while and it is
refreshing to see this kind of depth of story telling on the screen.
This may seem like a misnomer, coming in a review for a Japanese
monster film. But, believe me. While the film is fanciful and far
fetched, it is engrossing and very enjoyable. There is a nostalgic
quality here that is not lost on the audience. We can all remember
watching those beloved sci-fi thrillers from the 1950's with their
quaint effects and plotting. Some of those films are rightly
considered classics, and it's is those films that "Gamera 2" reflects
on. While far from being a classic itself, "Gamera 2" is a masterly
made and deftly plotted film.
The performances are all on the money here. Ayako Fujitani returns
from 'Gamera: Guardian of the Universe' as Asagi Kusanagi, the young
girl with the psychic link with Gamera. While only appearing in what
amounts to a cameo, Ms. Fujitani gives a nice performance as Asagi.
Also returning in a cameo is Yukijiro Hotaru as Osaka, former police
inspector from the previous Gamera film, now working as a security
guard for Kirin Beer. His inclusion adds the right touch of nostalgic
comedy to the film, it's a shame that his part is over so soon.
Miki Mizuno as Midori Honami is charming in her portrayal of the young
scientist who comes to identify the threat of Legion. Akiji Kobayashi
as Colonel Watarase is appropriately stern in his performance. It's a
shame that the other credits in this film are not translated from
their Japanese characters, as it makes identifying the many performers
difficult. Suffice to say, that the film is well performed and that
nothing is played for camp. This is an earnest thriller, comedy is
only a sporadic commodity here, and never used to detrimental effect.
The plotting and story construction of the film plays like a modern
day disaster film. The most immediate example that comes to mind would
be (unfortunately) "Armageddon", in that both films deal less with
their characters individual conflicts than with the larger, more
global problems in the plot. A better (and more nostalgic) template
would be the 1965 film "Crack in the World" (a fun programmer in it's
time). "Gamera 2" moves at a fast clip, not leaving the audience time
to question it's plot holes (of which there are a few but minor ones).
The tension and suspense are on the level of a national disaster,
almost documentarian in its approach. Emotionally, the film is
weightless, but on the level of escapism, the film shines above
anything done stateside in the past 10 years.
The special effects of  'Gamera 2'  are it's reason 'd aire. And to
say that they are impressive is to give too light of an image. While
the monsters are performed by men in intricately designed suits, the
method of the photography and miniature work is so marvelous as to
help one suspend their disbelief for a moment.. enough to become
absorbed into the film. The inclusion of computer effects is a welcome
change for the genre and bodes well for the future of Japanese Kaiju
(strange beast) films. With 'Gamera 2', one can truly witness a
wonderful amalgamation of both past and present effects techniques
that combine to create an enchanting, exciting and fresh look.
In conclusion, if giant monsters are your bent, or if your just
curious enough to try it out, 'Gamera 2: The Advent of Legion' is a
fine modern day introduction to the fantasy world of Japan. While a
little too light on character (human) involvement, the film more that
delivers in the action and monster quotient. An enjoyable film with
enough action to keep those explosive addicts placated until the next
Michael Bey extravaganza.

Title
Review for Sixth Sense, The (1999)
HOLLYWOOD PICTURES AND SPYGLASS ENTERTAINMENT PRESENTS
A KENNEDY/MARSHALL/BARRY MENDEL PRODUCTION   BRUCE WILLIS
"THE SIXTH SENSE"  AN M. NIGHT SHYAMALAN FILM   TONI COLLETTE
OLIVIA WILLIAMS  HALEY JOEL OSMENT
MUSIC BY JAMES NEWTON HOWARD  COSTUME DESIGNER  JOANNA JOHNSTON
EDITED BY ANDREW MONDSHEIN   PRODUCTION DESIGNER LARRY FULTON
DIRECTOR OF PHOTOGRAPHY TAK FUJIMOTO  EXECUTIVE PRODUCER SAM MERCER
PRODUCED BY FRANK MARSHALL, KATHLEEN KENNEDY AND BARRY MENDEL
WRITTEN AND DIRECTED BY M. NIGHT SHYAMALAN
"Not every gift is a blessing" So say the ads heeding the release of
Hollywood Pictures surprise sleeper.  Director M. Night Shyamalan has
crafted a marvelously creepy and soulful tale of terror and
redemption.
The film opens with the celebration of psychologist, Dr. Malcolm Crowe
(Bruce Willis) and his wife Anna (Olivia Williams), after having
received a commendation from the Mayor of Philadelphia. Intoxicated
and relaxing, the loving couple is unaware of an intruder in their
house, Vincent Gray, (an unrecognizable Donnie Wahlberg) distraught
over his treatment by Dr. Crowe. Unable to cope with his mania and
claiming to know why 'people are afraid when they're alone', Vincent
shoots Dr.  Crowe and then turns the gun on himself.
Several months later Dr. Crowe is a changed man. Disenchanted over the
failure of his treatment with Vincent Gray and the slow estrangement
of his marriage, Dr. Crowe anxiously needs the redemption that
successfully treating a patient would bring. His chance comes when he
meets 9 year old Cole Sear (Haley Joel Osmant), a boy traumatized by
his ability to see the dead. Slowly, Cole and Dr. Crowe build a
relationship. Slowly Dr. Crowe starts to believe the young boys
stories of otherworldly intervention. His investigation and research
lead him to evidence that these spirits visiting the boy may actually
looking for help. In a remarkably deft and heartfelt (not to mention
surprising) conclusion, Dr. Crowe manages to help the boy realize and
accept his gift while also coming to his own redemptive conclusion.
The script by Mr. Shyamalan is so deep with nuance and
characterization that one grows to appreciate and care about these
people. And when the ghosts start to make the manifestations physical,
the effect is startlingly chilling. The best filmic comparison would
possibly be the interesting "Jacob's Ladder'. What Mr. Shyamalan has
crafted is possibly one of the best, character rich horror films since
Robert Wise's "The Body Snatchers".
The performances are uniformly excellent, with Haley Joel Osmant
performance the standout. What showed as a promising debut as a young
Forrest in the classic "Forrest Gump", Haley Joel Osmant has grown
with each performance (most notably the underrated "Bogus", opposite
Gerald Depardieu). What young Mr. Osmant does in this film is nothing
less than extraordinary. With the subtlety of an Olivier, Mr.  Osmant
brings a truth and earnestness to his performance that is infective.
Within five minutes of screen time, one believes that this boy does in
fact see ghosts. I hereby cast my vote, and urge the Academy of Motion
Pictures and Sciences to set aside a Best Supporting Actor's nod to
this young talent. Mr. Osmant is more than worthy of it.
Bruce Willis, always maligned as an actor (everyone seems to forget
his marvelous performances in 1989's "In Country" and 1994's "Pulp
Fiction'), gives a retrained and poignant performance. His slow
realization of his situation and that of his young patient may be more
than he expects is so on key, that the revelatory denouncement of the
film is both surprisingly shocking and expected. An underrated
performer doing what he does best. Bringing nuance and depth to his
character, in such a way that it takes the audience off guard.
The best surprise in the film is Toni Collette as Lynn Sear, Cole's
single Mother. Unlike other film representations of parents in film,
Ms. Collette brings a degree of warmth to her role that is so
refreshing that it could be held as an example of single
parenting. The depth of her convictions and emotions are so well
realized that we respond to her passionately.  Also, while not being
the traditional Hollywood glamour type of parent, Ms. Collette's
physicality brings with it a comfortable familiarity. From her early
recognition in "Muriel's Wedding", Ms. Collette has proven herself to
be an actress of both depth and conviction. And those two qualities
shine in this film brightly.
To comment on M. Night Shyamalan's direction is to witness a
filmmaker, who is above all else a classic storyteller. Never does the
camera call attention to itself. The cinematography by Tak Fujimoto is
so unobtrusive that the shocks in the film do not seem to be set up,
coming as almost complete surprises.
Mr. Shyamalan's handling of even the quiet scenes is stunning. Most
notably is a sequence wherein Dr.  Crowe listens to the audio
recordings of his sessions with Vincent Gray. The slow, almost
cautious increase of volume, which finally reveals the ghostly voices
of those haunting Vincent, is marvelously cinematic. In his earlier
film 'Wide Awake" also dealt with the idea of death and the afterlife,
but with a lighthearted and sentimental approach. Here, with this film
the essence is on redemption.
Without revealing the ending of the film, one must conclude that not
all of the characters will be able to deal with the changes in their
lives. But the ultimate realization that the acceptance of death can
be more healing than any treatment can.
On a scale of one to five, "The Sixth Sense" rates a supernatural 4. A
marvelously creepy and thought provoking scare fest. One that will
have you talking for days.
Copyright Š 1999 R. L. Strong
Nothing in this article may be quoted or re-printed without the expressed
written permission of the author
****************************
Visit the Dungeon..
The Dungeon Master's Cornucopia of Film
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Makeup/5594/reviews/main.html

Title
Review for Galaxy Quest (1999)
DREAMWORKS PICTURES PRESENTS A MARK JOHNSON PRODUCTION
"GALAXY QUEST"
TIM ALLEN  SIGOURNEY WEAVER  ALAN RICKMAN  TONY SHALHOUB  SAM
ROCKWELL  DARYL MITCHELL  CO-PRODUCERS  SUZANN ELLIS & SONA GOURGOURIS
MUSIC BY DAVID NEWMAN
ALIEN MAKEUP AND CREATURE EFFECTS  STAN WINSTON
COSTUME DESIGNER ALBERT WOLSKY
EDITOR DON ZIMMERMAN, A.C.E.
PRODUCTION DESIGNER LINDA DESCENNA
DIRECTOR OF PHOTOGRAPHY JERZY ZEILINSKI
EXECUTIVE PRODUCER ELIZABETH CANTILLON
PRODUCED BY MARK JOHNSON & CHARLES NEWIRTH
STORY BY DAVID HOWARD
SCREENPLAY BY DAVID HOWARD AND ROBERT GORDON
DIRECTED BY DEAN PARISOT
Fandom is a strange phenomenon. There are those that revel in the
minutia of every episode of "Lost in Space", "Star Trek", Godzilla
movies and more. What is even more fascinating about fandom is the
growing acceptance and exploitation of it by those actors and
actresses that receive this attention. The film "Galaxy Quest" is a
film that both pokes fun at and embraces this faction, in a loving
tribute to both modern commercialism and old fashion escapism.
The film opens at a convention celebrating the cast and production of
a long ago canceled television show, 'Galaxy Quest'. The four cast
members waiting, behind stage for the arrival of the "Star" Jason
Nesmith (Tim Allen). They bicker and complain about the lack of
attention they had received due to their "Captain", and the
typecasting that has all but ended their careers. As Jason Nesmith
arrives and takes the stage with his T.V. crew, he soon becomes as
disenchanted as his fellow actors, overhearing a couple of kids
complaining about his posturing over a poor quality program. Knowing
that his fellow cast members hold him in the lowest of esteem, Jason
returns to his home to drink away his disappointment.
The following morning, Jason is awakened by a quartet of costumed
fans, who proclaim to be from the Klatuu Nebula asking him for his
help in saving their planet. Hung over and depressed, Jason believes
that the quartet is actually a production group he had previously
arranged an engagement with. So getting into their limousine, Jason
passes out as the four Aliens brief him on their history and the
situation at hand. The limousine turns into an alley and is suddenly
lifted off the ground.
Waking up on, what he believes to be one of the most elaborate sets
he's ever seen. Moving into the command deck, Jason confronts Saris
(Robin Sachs), the evil Alien dictator who is out to conquer the
"Thermions". Nonchalantly, carrying on his role, Jason commands the
alien crew to fire on Saris' ship. Feeling that the gig is over, Jason
walks off the deck and is followed by Mathesar (Enrico Colantoni), who
is concerned of the situation but agrees to send Jason home so that he
can arrive at another engagement in the San Fernando Valley. Locking
Jason into a steel room, Jason cries out "Hey, where's my Limo?", as
the outer doors open revealing the vast nebula of space. Encased in a
liquid bubble, Jason is catapulted through a black hole and onto the
deck by his swimming pool.
Rushing to a Hardware Store, where the other cast members of "Galaxy
Quest" are engaged in a ribbon cutting ceremony, Jason tries to tell
his "crew" about his adventures. As Jason tells the group, Mathesar
and his group arrive to report of Saris' survival and demand for
surrender. Angry and disappointed Jason's fellow actors walk off,
until they realize that Jason may have been offering them.. a job.
"Galaxy Quest" is just pure entertainment. Light, jovial, and just a
hell of a lot of fun.  The screenplay by David Howard and Robert
Gorgon is both a knowing and loving tribute to classic sci-fi
television but also to the fandom that it has inspired. Seen as a
lampoon on the 'Star Trek Convention' circuit, "Galaxy Quest", pulls
out many fanciful rumors of cast squabbling, cardboard sets, the
obligatory cast member who must die, and fans who attend the
conventions costumed as their favorite character. The adventure in
space is as enjoyable (if not more so), in that the actors now have to
behave as the characters they had once portrayed, all the while
bitching and complaining about Jason trying to "hog the scene".
Tim Allen gives his best performance here. His comic timing has never
been more on the mark. But the real charm here is the marvelous comic
turn by Sigourney Weaver as actress Gwen DeMarco. Besting her
performance in "Ghostbusters", Ms. Weaver gives a hilariously
performance as an actress noted for her bosom and "repeating whatever
the computer says".
Desperate to escape from the clutches of typecasting, Alan Rickman as
actor Sir Alexander is absolutely droll in his role, oblivious to the
foam latex head piece he wares throughout the film Tony gives the
character of Fred Kwan a wonderful deadpan quality. His acceptance of
whatever happens is the counterbalance to the rest of the cast.
Special mention also to Daryl Mitchell as Tommy Webber who manages to
be both the innocent of the group and the one most needing to follow
his fellow actors wherever they go. Enrico Colantoni as Mathesar
painfully funny, his delivery of his lines spoken through a tight
misunderstanding of the pronunciation and meaning of English, is
almost vaudevillian in its delivery and use of strange accent. Sam
Rockwell as Guy Fleegman is hilarious, a part time actor who stumbles
upon the adventure of the lifetime and is fearful for his life because
"his character does not have a last name". And finally, Robin Sachs ,
laboring under heavy costuming and makeup as Saris, gives a formidable
performance, augmented by Stan Winston's marvelous creature designs
and makeup.
As for the technical  credits, Stan Winston's creature effects, what
can be said but bravo. From recycling his Martian design from Tobe
Hooper's "Invader's From Mars", to creating some humorous new designs
for the aliens, Stan Winston proves why he is one of the industries
most sought after effects technicians. And the special effects  by
Industrial Light and Magic continue to amaze and delight. The
cinematography by Jerzy Zielinski is nicely appropriate, conveying
both the concepts and timings of a television drama while also
enveloping the screen with a bright and colorful template. David
Newman's score is both heroic and cliched in such a way that it calls
up both the absurdity of the concept while reveling in its campiness.
A damn good score that bears repeated listening.
Director Dean Parisot handles the film with a sure hand and style that
is both simplistic and unique. One of the most humorous tricks the
film plays is that the opening of the film starts off at an aspect
ration of 1.66:1(1.66 times as wide as it is tall), not a very wide
composition, looking almost like a television show. It soon shifts to
a theatrical ratio of 1.85:1 during the convention scenes, finally
settling to a full panavision ratio of 2.35:1 with Jason Nesmith
finally realizing he is actually in outer space (it's unfortunate that
this marvelous gag will be lost on home video). Director Parisot
manages to create a charming and very funny homage to fandom.
"Galaxy Quest" is just one fun evenings worth of entertainment. A fine
film for the whole family, with only a few questionable moments for
younger children. But still a film that will entertain and can be
enjoyed over and over again.
 Owned & Copyright Š 1999-2000 R.L. StrongNothing in this article may
be quoted or re-printed without the expressed written permission of
the author.

Title
Review for Good Humor Man, The (1950)
COLUMBIA PICTURES PRESENTS AN  S. SYLVAN SIMON PRODUCTION
JACK CARSON IS 'THE GOOD HUMOR MAN"   LOLA ALBRIGHT   JEAN WALLACE
GEORGE REEVES   FRANK FERGUSON   CHICK COLLINS  JACK OVERMAN
RICHARD EGAN  AND  EDDIE PARKER
CINEMATOGRAPHY BY LESTER WHITE
EDITED BY JEROME THOMS
MUSIC BY HEINZ ROEMHELD
PRODUCED BY S. SYLVAN SIMON
SCREENPLAY BY FRANK TASHLIN
BASED ON A STORY BY ROY HUGGINS
DIRECTED BY LLOYD BACON
The 1950's were a period of Americana that many of us have embraced
and cherished. The innocents and sense of discovery during that era
were both frightening and comforting. Many of the films released
during that decade reflected both the political and societal changes
taking place in the U.S. But there was also escapism and fun to be
had. The many shorts featurette staring the Three Stooges (with Shemp
Howard), Red Skelton's later films and Howard Hawks' attempts at
screwball comedy all managed to soften the blow brought about by the
troubling times of the 1950's.
One of those films is the unheralded classic "THE GOOD HUMOR MAN" a
slapstick gem that manages to make nostalgic the innocents of the
1930's while taking place in 1950. The story is a simple little caper
about a good natured Ice Cream Salesman who is caught up in a scheme
to steal money from a payroll.
It what could have been an offshoot of the classic Red Skelton vehicle
"The Fuller Brush Man", "The Good Humor Man" manages to both charm and
enthrall with it's simple and witty comedy. Jack Carter stars as Biff
Jones, a mild mannered milquetoast who is in love with Margie Bellew
(Lola Albright). While driving home one night, Biff is confronted by a
Bonnie Conroy, a young woman who is being pursued by three hoods.
Biff, caught in the middle of the struggle is knocked unconscious by
the hoods, giving Bonnie an opportunity to escape.
When Biff is fired from his job, Bonnie reappears asking for his help.
Terrified, she pleads with the Good Humor Man to stay the night with
her for protection. Biff agrees on the condition that Bonnie buy all
of his ice cream. In the morning, Biff wakes to find Bonnie dead in
the living room. Convinced that he murdered the girl in his sleep, he
calls the police to turn himself in. When the police arrive, Biff is
dumbfounded to find that the scene of the crime has been completely
clean of all evidence. Situations change when Biff's Ice Cream truck
is reported to have been seen at the scene of a robbery of
$300,000.00. With Biff the primary suspect, it is up to him, Margie,
Her little brother and the Captain Marvel fan club to rescue him from
the bad guys and prove his innocents.
"The Good Humor Man" is a marvelously charming and good natured
comedy. The slapstick and mayhem in the film is of the Red Skelton, 3
Stooges, Laurel and Hardy school of comedy. Lots of double takes and
double entendre litter the plot and are so prolific that they create
second pulse for the film. There are a couple of instances of racial
humor, but nothing really offensive and is of the time and place the
film was made. The climatic chase and battle in the school classrooms
is a showstopper. Wire gags, sped up photography and just outright
silly situations create a loving tribute to the silent films of Buster
Keaton and Max Sennet. The last twenty minutes of the film is so full
of situations and comedic stunts as to be almost draining. The
filmmakers go all out to place one deadly and hilarious situation
after another, creating a sort of Rube Goldbergian series of captures
and escapes that is absolutely joyous in both it's complexity and
inventiveness.
Written by Frank Tashlin (formerly an Animation Director at Warner
Brothers), "The Good Humor Man" moves at a brisk pace. It's 79 minute
running time seeming a lot shorter. Using the plot from the thriller
"Appointment with Fear" by Roy Higgins, Mr. Tashlin has crafted a
grand piece of entertainment.
Director Lloyd Bacon, uses every trick in the book on this moderately
budgeted production. The use of wire gags and props is so expert in
their timing and execution, that one can't help but be reminded of the
classic Laurel and Hardy shorts. The performances by all of the cast
are perfectly tuned to the film, with larger than life villains and
damsels in distress. The surprising turn here is by future Superman,
George Reeves as the villainous Stuart Nagle. Never really appreciated
as a character actor, Mr. Reeves sense of timing is perfect, showing
him to be an actor of more range than ever given credit for. It's
really a shame that his part is so small in this film.
The best turn is from, of course Jack Carson. Jack Carson began his
career at RKO studios as an extra. He grew into on of the industries
most recognized character actors, working in such diverse films as
"The Strawberry Blonde" (with James Cagney) and "Mildred Peirce" (with
Joan Crawford in which he received his best notices). Mr. Carson uses
his famed double take to new heights here, playing Biff Jones as an
innocent man, still caught up in his childhood. That childlike
innocents is what makes the character so charmingly funny, much like
Red Skelton's character in "The Fuller Brush Man. He is not a buffoon.
He is a grown child, an essence that helps define (or defend) the
innocents of the time. This is Jack Carson's film. His demeanor and
stature (he stood 6 foot 2 inches), combine to make the character both
charming and believable.
"The Good Humor Man" is one of the industries most underrated
comedies. A charming and enjoyable romp that with give you some really
healthy belly laughs, if you're of the mind to succumb  to it's
simplistic charms.
On a side note, watching the film again recently; I've come to the
conclusion that some of today's film makers are more than aware of the
talents involved in this film. Such diverse projects as Tim Burton's
"Pee Wee's Big Adventure", and any of Jackie Chan's recent vehicles
all show an appreciation and love for this type of comedy. Not as
drawn out as some of Blake Edwards work (i.e. 'The Pink Panther, The
Party), but more in line with the work of Producer  S. Sylvan Simon,
and the many other talents that endeavored to make comedy something
universal.
Unavailable on Home Video presently, "The Good Humor Man" does turn up
on television from time to time. It would be well worth your while to
seek this film out. It is one of the best comedies of its time.
Owned and Copyright Š 1999, 2000 R. L. Strong
Nothing in this article may be quoted or re-printed
without the expressed written permission of the author.

Title
Review for Gamera 3: Iris kakusei (1999)

TOHO COMPANY LTD. PRESENTS A DAIEI MOTION PICTURE COMPANY PRODUCTION
A SHUSUKE KANEKO FILM
"GAMERA 3: THE REVENGE OF IRIS"
SHINOBU NAKAYAMA      AI MAEDA      AYAKO FUJITANI     SENRI YAMASAKI
CINEMATOGRAPHY  BY  JUN'ICHI TOZAWA
EDITED BY ISAO TOMITA
SOUND DESIGN BY YASUO HASHIMOTO
EXECUTIVE PRODUCERS  TSUTOMU TSUCHIKAWA, KAZUHIKO ISHIKAWA &  NAOMASA TSRUTA
DIRECTOR OF SPECIAL EFFECTS  SHINJI HIGUCHI
VISUAL EFFECTS  HAJIME MATSUMOTO
MUSIC  KOH OHTANI
ASSOCIATE PRODUCERS  SEIJI OKUDA  NAOYA FUJIMAKI
PRODUCERS  TSUTOMU TSUCHIKAWA, NAOKI SATO & MIYUKI NANRI
SCREENPLAY BY KAZUNORI ITO & SHUSUKE KANEKO
DIRECTED BY SHUSUKE KANEKO
There's something to be said about a movie with a man in a rubber monster suit
that manages to thrill and enthrall an audience more than any of the summer's
big budget blockbusters. At a premiere screening at the American Cinemateque in
Hollywood at the famous Egyptian Theater, I was witness to a new breed of
Japanese monster movie.
As everyone who grew up in the 60's and 70's will remember, television here is
the U.S. was riff with the likes of Godzilla, King Kong and assorted denizens.
One of these humorously contrived creatures was the Giant turtle Gamera. Having
the lowest budgets of any of monster cousins, Gamera had to have something a
little different to gain any sort of appeal. Well, give him the ability to fly,
by spitting fire out of his legs and have him spin like a flying saucer and
you've got one heavy-duty childhood favorite on your hands. Now to be certain,
Gamera was never aimed at adults, in fact most folks under the age of 10 could
barely stand the critter. But with the release of 'Gamera 3: The Revenge of
Iris' (the third in a series), all that has changed.
1999. Japan has just survived another protective onslaught from Gamera. But the
military looks upon the monster not as savior but as a destructive force that
must be contained. There are much political rambling about what must be done
about the beast, as his appearances throughout Japan have caused millions of
dollars in damage and thousands of lives.
We are introduced to Ayana Hirasaka (newcomer Ai Maeda); a teenage girl whose
parents were killed in 1995 during Gamera's battle with a giant bird like
creature called Gyaos (pronounced guy-ohs). Ayana holds a bitter hatred for
Gamera. Having no immediate family, she and her little brother must live with
her Uncle on a Small Island community outside of Japan. The other children on
the Island treat Ayana as an outside. In an effort to avoid any more abuse, she
accepts a dare to enter a cave, once a shrine to a demigod protected by a local
family.  Walking into the cave, Ayana comes across a strange rock that glows
under her touch. Removing the rock, she unearths a 12-foot egg. As the egg
hatches, Ayana befriends the tentacled creature, naming it Iris after her
parent's cat. Her nurturing of the creature takes on darker tones as it is
learned that the creature is vampiric, feeding off of her hatred of Gamera and
developing a psychic link with Ayana, that will shortly become more than
psychic.
In the meantime, a new species of Gyaos have appeared all over the world. Gamera
attacks two of the creatures over Tokyo, causing tremendous damage, as the Gyaos
is destroyed by Gamera's fiery breath. The military will stand still no longer.
Gamera is a tremendous liability and must be countered.
I haven't given away a lot of the plot details, just the basic premise. There is
so much to enjoy within this film that  to reveal all of the film's charm would
be a great disservice. This is (believe it or not) one of the most tightly and
intelligently scripted monster films since the 1950's.  The performances by the
young cast is notable for it's professionalism and underplaying in roles that
could have been played campy or over the top. Shinobu Nakayama (Jet Li's Fist of
Legend) stars as Mayumi Nagamine, an ornithologist involved with Gamera is
wonderfully photogenic and sincere in her performance.
Ayako Fujitani (Steven Segal's Daughter) return as Asagi Kusanagi from the first
Gamera film in this series. Her character once had a psychic link with Gamera,
but now has lost it. Still, she honors the beast as a protector of Earth, an
idea that may or may not be true. Her performance is nicely toned with a
respectable demeanor, suitable to a girl who is still finding her way in life.
Ai Maeda as Ayana is wonderful in her performance, having to express teen angst
and despair. Her slow realization that the monster Iris is indeed evil is
painfully touching. A nice performance from this newcomer.
Director Shusuke Kaneko and screenwriter Kazunori Ito have drafted a marvelously
complex tale of monsters and the human condition. In fact, 'Gamera 3' eschews
most of the monster action in favor of the human story which is more than
compelling. The mystery of Gamera always remains in the background, though. The
series of events unfold naturally, leading the viewer from one marvelously
apocalyptic scene to another, but always keeping us grounded in the human story.
And what would a monster film be without special effects, not much of a monster
to be sure.
The scenes of battle and destruction have a marvelously composed look and style
to them. One is immediately reminded of some of the classic films from the
1930's like 'King Kong' with its wonderful atmosphere. Or more recently 'What
Dreams May Come', wherein the style and look of the visuals bring the film into
a whole new arena. 'Gamera 3' does that with spectacular energy and drama.
You'll forget soon into the movie that the creatures are fake and made of rubber
and foam. The design of the beast is both attractive and frightening. A sense of
awe surrounds these beasts in a way that you must experience yourself.
"Gamera 3: The Revenge of Iris" is without a doubt one of the best monster films
to come out of Japan, or anywhere for that matter. A film that does not talk
down to it's audience, nor takes them for granted. For those who enjoy giant
monster you'll have to seek this one out. For those of you could care less,
you're in for a surprise if not a conversion.
On a scale between 1 to 5, 'Gamera 3: The Revenge of Iris" rates a monstrous 4.
Parents should be forewarned, this film is (as of yet) unrated and does contain
scenes of destruction and human suffering. While there is no bloodshed or gore,
the violence of the film makes it unsuitable for very young children. Japanese
Language with English Subtitles.
Copyright 1999 R. L Strong
All rights reserved Nothing in this article may be quoted or
re-printed without the express written permission of the author.

Title
Review for End of Days (1999)
UNIVERSAL PICTURES AND BEACON PICTURES PRESENTS ARNOLD
SCHWARZENEGGER   A PETER HYAMS FILM "END OF DAYS" GABRIEL BYRNE  KEVIN
POLLACK  ROBIN TUNNEY
ROD STEIGER  MUSIC SUPERVISOR G. MARQ ROSWELL  MUSIC BY JOHN DEBNEY
EXECUTIVE PRODUCERS MARC ABRAHAM  THOMAS A. BLISS PRODUCED BY ARMYAN
BERNSTEIN  BILL BORDAN WRITTEN BY ANDREW W. MARLOWE  DIRECTED BY PETER
HYAMS
"You'll never know what you'll agree too when you're on fire!"
 And most will feel burned by this latest offering from the king of
action, Arnold Schwarzenegger. A trite and overly complex plot about
Satan's coming to Earth to father his son. A hodge-podge of ideas and
themes lifted almost verbatim from a host of other, better films.
1979.. a monk in the Vatican, recognizing a prophetic astrological
occurrence; alerts the Pope that the bride of Satan has been born. An
argument between the counsel and the Pope ensues, one side believing
that the Child must be killed, the other believing that she must be
protected. The Pope decrees, that the child must be protected and that
we must have faith in God.
As the child is born, An intern (Udo Kier) in a New York hospital
delivers the newborn to a group of Satanists in the basement of the
hospital  where she is fed the blood of a rattlesnake, the gathered
looking on in awe and enlightenment.
Flash forward 20 years to December 28th, 1999. As Satan rises up from
the city's sewer system (destroying a city block in the process), he
then possesses the body of  New York socialite (Gabriel Byrne) and
destroys another city block in a firestorm.
We are now introduced to Schwarzenegger 's character, Jericho Cane
(subtlety in names is not a concern here), an alcoholic and suicidal
New York detective. He is currently serving as protection for the
aforementioned Socialite. When an assassination attempt goes bad,
Jericho gives chase, hanging from a helicopter by a cable. Catching
and losing his suspect, the chase continues into the subway system,
where the assassin is caught and found to be Thomas Aquinas (Derrick
O'Connor) an elderly Priest, who rants about the end of the Thousand
years (a biblical reference to Christ's rule over the Earth).
Somehow, Jericho and his partner Chicago (Kevin Pollak) find Aquinas'
lair in the sewers. Amidst all of the religious scribblings and
newspaper clippings proclaiming the end of the world, they find a
newspaper photo of a young girl. We are then introduced to Christine
York (Robin Tunney) as she is approached by a street urchin, who
accosts her with warnings of an impending rape. As she grabs his arm,
the man shatters into thousands of pieces like glass. Christine
screams, upsetting the passengers on the train who have seen nothing,
as this was a hallucinations. Christine apologizes to her fellow
passengers for her outburst.
I'm not going to go into any further detail of this plot, since if
these already absurd situations haven't already eliminated any desire
you may have had to see this film, than nothing I can say in this
review will change your mind. Suffice to say, you have been warned.
For those of you that need to understand my complete dislike of this
film, let me continue.
The script by Andrew W. Marlowe (1997's "Air Force One") is hackneyed
to say the least. No research into biblical scriptures of any kind was
done, as made clear by the idea that our current time period is being
ruled by Christ ('The thousand years are over!"). As anyone who has
gone to church should know that Christ's rule happens after the battle
between heaven and hell.. But this is only the most minor of
convoluted ideas and plot contrivances retched up for this
Thanksgiving gift. The scripts' utter lack of knowledge of what
religion and faith is, (and for that matter what makes a good horror
film) are tantamount to blasphemy. But suffice to say, that this
Thanksgiving turkey is nothing more that baloney.
Christine is surrounded by loyal worshippers of Satan, who conspire to
make her the bride of their dark Lord. Why, we are not told. Why there
are two factions within the Catholic Church is also glossed over.
Every minion of Satan has superhuman strength, but can't survive
bullets. And Arnold can just walk into an armory and carry out more
weapons than the National Guard without the slightest protest. This is
a jig-saw puzzle type script. The mix of ideas and themes lifted from
films such as "Rosemary's Baby", "The Omen", "Godfather 3", "The
Devil's Advocate" and too many others to mention could almost
constitute copyright infringement. There is not one original idea or
concept here. This is just possibly one of the worst horror films ever
made by a major studio. Scenes from other films are lifted almost
verbatim. This is almost as maddening as "Godzilla" (which still ranks
as the most brain dead film of the 90's)
Arnold Schwarzenegger is horribly miscast as an alcoholic, self
destructive man. If anyone looked at the character as written, and
looked at Arnold's physique, one would assume that alcohol, consumed
in daily quantities of a gallon or more has the same effect as
Popeye's spinach. I found myself laughing out loud, at some of the
trademark Arnold one liners in this one, all about as subtle as those
used in "Batman and Robin".
As it is, the performances as acceptable. The surprise here is Gabriel
Byrne as the Devil in the Flesh. Without any other motivation that to
be as coldly evil as possibly, Byrne manages to have fun with the
part, drawing the only source of fluidity and fun out of this desert
of a script. Robin Tunney as the victim Christine York does what she
can with a role more under written than that of Byrne's. She does have
a presents on screen, and hopefully she can move on to better roles.
Kevin Pollak turns in the obligatory comic side kick role with his
usual aplomb. Nothing more, nothing less. The greatest miscarriage
here, is the utter waste of Rod Steiger as Father Kovak. His sole
purpose to spout out exposition to help explain a hopelessly muddled
plot. The rest of the cast does their jobs adequately, knowing full
well that in this film no one will notice the performances. This is a
fine example of film that relies on its special effects for any
entertainment it may have. The problem.. like everything else in the
film is we've seen them before.
The direction by Peter Hyams is similar to his work on both "The
Relic" and the Jean Claude Van Damme vehicles "Sudden Death" and
"Timecop". Neither praise nor pan, Mr. Hyams does what he does best,
and that's putting together an amusing action scene.
To sum up the experience of watching "End of Days", I'll quote a
dialogue exchange from the film.
Satan: I can give you whatever you want. Just tell Me.. what do you
want?
Jericho: I want.. you.. to go to Hell!

Title
Review for Rules of Engagement (2000)
PARAMOUNT PICTURES PRESENTS IN ASSOCIATION WITH SEVEN ARTS PICTURES
A RICHARD D. ZANUCH / SCOTT RUDIN PRODUCTION   A WILLIAM FRIEDKIN FILM
"The line between being a Hero and a Murderer is a very, very thin
one"
So says Colonel Hayes Hodges (Tommy Lee Jones) in his attempt to
defend his friend Colonel Terry L. Childers (Samuel L. Jackson)
against charges of ordering his troops to fire on an unarmed group of
protesters at the U.S. embassy in Yemen. "Rules of Engagement" is an
interesting film on many levels but ultimately doesn't quite work
because of a week second half.
The film opens in Vietnam in 1968, as Marine Colonels Hayes Hodges and
Terry Childers work their way through the jungle. Splitting up to find
an enemy strong hold, the two teams are attacked. Childers' squad is
attacked first but manages to capture the Vietnamese Colonel Cao
(Baoan Coleman). It is almost immediately afterwards that Hodges troop
is attacked while crossing a swamp. The casualties are high and Hodges
is wounded. As Childers hears the fire fight, he commands Colonel Cao
to radio his men and order them to retreat. Childers' threatens Cao
with death if the order is not carried out. Cao refuses. Childers'
then shoots and kills Cao's radio operator. Cao then relents under
fear of his own death.
Hodges is saved. Childers is a hero and the two men cement a
friendship that will stand as a greater honor than anything else in
the Marine Corps. The film moves forward to present day. Colonel Hayes
Hodges is retiring. A career marine, Hodges feels weary and tired,
disappointed in not living up to his Father's (Philip Baker Hall)
legacy.
In the Middle East, tensions are rising. Situations come to a head
when the U.S. Embassy in Yemen is surrounded by a large crowd of
Demonstrators.  Snipers fire at the builder, as workers scramble
trying to salvage whatever they can. Ambassador Mourain  (Ben
Kingsley), his wife (Anne Archer) and their son are all in danger. The
U.S. Government orders the marines to send in a rescue team to extract
the Americans and their families. Col. Terry Childers, is ordered to
lead a squadron of Marines in the rescue attempt. Dodging sniper fire,
Hodges locates the Ambassador and leads him and his family to a
waiting helicopter. Childers them returns to the roof of the Embassy
to retrieve the U.S. flag. In the process, one of Childers' men is
killed. Childers sends the Ambassador on his way, and returns to his
troops. Two more marines are killed. Childers then orders his men to
open fire on the crown gathered at the front of the Embassy. More than
the 80 Yemeni men, women and children killed by Marine gunfire.
The situation comes to a head when word gets back to the State
Department. A political firestorm has begun. National  Security
Adviser, William Sokal (Conrad Bachmann), demands that Colonel
Childers be brought up on charges of murder. As there is no evidence
that the crowd in front of the Embassy had weapons, Childers must have
fired into the crowd of civilians, instead of firing at the snipers on
the roofs across from the Embassy,.
Knowing that the situation is dire, Childers goes to the one man whom
he feels can help him.. Hayes Hodges. The two men start to investigate
the case with only eight days before Court Marshal proceedings begin.
Hodges has trepidation's about his abilities. He's not a very good
attorney and knows it. With the short time he has, Hodges  flies to
Yemen in an effort to find a corroborating witness for his friend and
client. When Hodges returns, his own doubts about his friend
jeopardize both the case and their friendship.
"Rules of Engagement" is seemingly an honest film. The first half of
the feature is very well played, with a good level of intensity and
commitment. It's the second half of the film, the trial itself when
the film starts to bog down into typical cinematic territory. The
biggest mistake the film makes is in having a nominal villain in the
piece.
Having the National Security Adviser commit such a heinous act in the
body of the film completely stops the momentum of the film dead in its
tracks. Giving the audience an identifiable bad guy is such a
concession to market research, that the film cannot recover from it.
Furthermore, the film did not need this concession, as the plot
creates the situation without it. The addition of the scene becomes
redundant.
One of the biggest and most noble surprises in the film, is the honest
and non-inflammatory was that the Marine Corps are portrayed. The
introductory scenes in Vietnam are as palpable as anything by Kubrick
or Oliver Stone. This sequence is very well directed and performed,
and is a grand introduction to the rest of the film.
The courtroom scenes are as traditional as one could expect. As with
other films of this type, it is the performances that carry the scenes
forward. Samuel L. Jackson carries his scenes with an intense and
proud demeanor. His Colonel Terry L. Childers is a proud Marine and a
proud man. His instinctive and passionate command is both refreshing
and invigorating. A very good performance.
Tommy Lee Jones gives the best performances in the film. A man,
equally proud of his military command, but haunted by his own
failures. As Retired Colonel Hayes Hodges is called back into duty at
the request of his friend, Jones plays the difficult emotions and
crisis with a subtle grace that simmers with both apprehension and
self doubt. Tommy Lee Jones has always given credible and exciting
performances, but here he is called upon to internalize his fear and
anger. And when they finally come to the surface, that explosion is
also reigned in. In his fight with Childers, Hodges continually
hesitates. Doubting his own conclusions, and again disliking himself
for not trusting the man who had save his life in Vietnam.
"Rules of Engagement" marks the return of famed Director William
Friedkin. Friedkin's career has been spotty over the last decade.
While his style and finesse have always been beyond reproach, his
choice of material has not always been up to the level of his talent.
Here, the director has a script that challenges him while also playing
it safe. There is much to like about the film. "Rules of Engagement"
does not succumb to the jingoist marching usually associated with
films about the military. Nor does it play the military as inherently
evil. The soldiers are all played as men who have chosen to serve
their country. And for a change, the soldiers are shown to have
individual ideals and passions. Guy Pearce (as Prosecutor Major Mark
Biggs) almost stealing the film from the two leads. Pearce (who was
remarkable in "L.A. Confidential"), continues to amaze the audience
with his command of dialects (he is Australian), and the naturalness
of his performance.
"Rules of Engagement" is a marginally good film. It is worth seeing.
But it would have played much better had not the villainous subterfuge
been so obvious. A concession to modern day teen audiences, that the
film is not even aimed at.
Owner & Copyright Š 2000 R. L Strong  All Rights Reserved
Nothing in this article may be quoted or re-printed
without the express written permission of the author.

Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)

STAR WARS: EPISODE I    THE PHANTOM MENACE
Liam Neeson    Ewan McGregor   Natalie Portman   Jake Lloyd
Ian McDiarmid   Anthony Daniels  Kenny Baker  Ray Park   Samuel L. Jackson
Original music by John Williams   
Cinematography by David Tattersall
Executive Producer  Rick McCallum  
Film Editing by Ben Burtt & Paul Martin Smith
Produced by George Lucas      
Written and Directed by George Lucas
A LUCASFILM PRODUCTION     
RELEASED BY 20TH CENTURY FOX
"A long time ago.. in a galaxy far far away". No other phrase can
conjure such images of bravery and adventure. George Lucas, the
creator of the epic 'Star Wars' series has crafted an effortlessly
complex and remarkably simple tale of heroes and villains. A series of
films that deserve their classic status, if for no other reason than
their value as pure escapism. 22 years after the release of the
original 'Star Wars (Episode III: A New Hope), George Lucas has
returned to the saga that has remained vivid in the imaginations of
all who have seen it.  "STAR WARS EPISODE I: THE PHANTOM MENACE"
brings us to the beginnings of the tale, giving us the history before
Luke Skywalker.
The opening title crawl of the film continues the serial approach
established by the earlier Star Wars films. "Turmoil has engulfed the
Galactic Republic. The taxation of trade routes to outlying star
systems is in dispute. Hoping to resolve the matter with a blockade of
deadly battleships, the greedy Trade Federation has stopped all
shipping to the small planet of Naboo.  While the Congress of the
Republic endlessly debates this alarming chain of events, the Supreme
Chancellor has secretly dispatched two Jedi Knights, the guardians of
peace, to settle the conflict...."
It is here that we are immersed into the political world of 'Star
Wars', for the first time. As Jedi Knight Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson)
and his apprentice, Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor) board a Trade
Federation ship in an effort to negotiate a treaty. Unbeknownst to the
Jedi, is that the negotiations are not to take place. On the command
of Darth Sidious, the Jedi are attacked. In an epic battle, the two
men escape on board an armored transport. A full-scale invasion of
Naboo is emanating. Qui-Gon and Obi-Wan must reach the city to warn
the Queen Amidala of the subterfuge that is taking place.
Reaching the palace with the assistance of an exiled Gungan, Jar-Jar
Binks. The two Jedi succeed in contacting the Queen who requests that
they return to the Congress of the Galactic Republic and report to the
senators of the events.  Along for the trip is the Queen's envoy
Padmé Naberrie (Natalie Portman) and Jar-Jar Binks. It is during
the escape that from Naboo that the ship is damaged and forced to land
on the planet Tatooine. While attempting to repair their ship, Qui-Gon
meets Annakin Skywalker (Jake Lloyd), a boy / slave working for a junk
dealer.  Impressed with the boy's expertise with machinery and sensing
something unique, Qui-Gon tests the boy believing the young Annakin to
be "The Chosen One" predicted in Jedi mythology, "the one who will
bring balance to the Force".
What must be said first and foremost about "The Phantom Menace" is
that its visual effects are absolutely mind-boggling. There has never
been a film that has created such vistas so continually as this film
has. The cities, forests, and swamps of Naboo are wondrously
realized. So much detail to attention has been lavished that one feels
that these worlds are real. The cityscapes of Naboo, Tatooine and
especially the galactic capital of Coruscant with it's Senate Chambers
and Jedi Temple. Every single location of the plot is fully
realized. The only film that could come close to this level of
visualization would be the silent classic "Metropolis" (1925),
"Forbidden Planet" (1958), and "2001: A Space Odyssey" (1968). I can't
mention any film since the original 'Star Wars' (1976) as every film
since then has used that film as a template.  What George Lucas has
done here, is enlarge his template and his mythology to include so
much more depth and resonance.  This is not to say that the film does
not have flaws. The performances in the film are adequate if not fully
drawn out. Liam Neeson plays his part of Qui-Gon Jinn with a stoic
demeanor that could be seen as lethargic. I did not find this
performance as troublesome as others did, simply because of the
characterization of the Jedi. The doctrine that one must not give into
their fear or anger, gives resonance to Neeson's performance. Being a
mentor to Obi-Wan, he must hold himself to a higher level. His
demeanor throughout the film is one of cautious resolution. He knows
that his fate is leading him is a particular direction and he refuses
to move against his fate. This is a classic characterization of the
'Ahab' principle. Qui-Gon has found the 'Chosen One' and must, by any
means bring this savior (?) to his full potential.
Ewan McGregor makes an enigmatic Obi-Wan, a man who is just coming
into his prime. Just mature enough to understand his responsibility
but not enough to realize the consequences of his actions. McGregor
does carry the film, even from the background. His character is the
only one that we readily recognize from the previous Star Wars
films. And that being said, McGregor does a reasonable job in the
performance, one that I am certain will grow (as Mark Hamill's did in
the original trilogy) in depth and nuance.
Natalie Portman as Queen Amidala and her guardian Padmé Naberrie
has the hardest role in the film. Having to portray a character of 14
that must rule over a planet and it's citizenry is some
problematic. Having to establish Queen Amidala as a stern and
compassionate leader, it becomes very surprising when as Padmé, she
must emote some of the inquisitiveness that someone her age would
naturally have, while still holding a level of maturity. Portman does
this fairly well, and in moments actually raises the character to a
more mythic level. A performance similarly to Carrie Fisher's,
Princess Leia in the original Star Wars.
The other performances in the film are either background characters or
Computer generated. Much has been said about the character Jar-Jar
Binks. Most of it negatively so. For my viewing, I found the character
less than delightful, but far from insufferable. I think the most
bothersome characteristic about the creature is its design. The legs
are just far too long for any creature to walk on land, hence his
natural clumsiness. That being said, I found the character's comic
value appropriate to the film, in as much with all of the stern and
troubled characters in the plot, having one that was behaving like
"Jerry Lewis" in a Godzilla suit was appropriate. If only to lighten
the film.
The set and costume design for the film is ravishing. There is so much
to take in, in every scene that it forces the viewer to concentrate on
the main characters and the story (which may have been reason for some
of the more faint reviews). The visuals of the film, as stated before
are staggering in their complexity and all invasiveness. I don't
believe there is one scene in "The Phantom Menace" that does not carry
a visual effect. That being said, the effects are seamless, blending
into the film in such a way that one feels that huge sets and dioramas
have been constructed for the actors to perform in. No faint praise.
George Lucas has managed to create a good old-fashioned adventure
film. While his dialogue is at time trite and forced ('There's always
a bigger fish'), it works in the context that this film (as all of the
other Star Wars films) is a fantasy for children. Lucas has managed to
delve deep into his belief in eastern philosophies and bring new depth
to the mythology of the Star Wars saga. Having a biological essence as
being a precursor for being a Jedi is interesting, if not completely
acceptable. Also, there is the continuing adaptation of
Judeo-Christian faith and mythology into the story in the idea that
Annakin Skywalker may have been birth by a virgin. But these tracks
are but fleeting thoughts in the film, brought to fore only in a
single line of dialogue. This, like the reference to the "Clone Wars"
in the original film may be there just to create a more complete
universe.
Lucas's direction is straight forewarn and unobtrusive. His staging of
the many battles and fight scenes are masterfully achieved. While the
climatic light saber battle between Obi-Wan, Qui-Gon and the evil
Darth Maul is powerful and exciting, after years of seeing martial
arts displayed on screen from Jackie Chan to this years "The Matrix",
the fights have nothing new to offer. Also, I found the fights lacking
in character in all but the suspense sequence wherein Qui-Gon and
Darth Maul must suspend their battle, separated by force fields.  This
particular scene leads a certain tension to the battle, as well as
giving an opportunity to move to one of the other simultaneously
accruing plot threads.  Unfortunately, it's a short-lived moment. The
fight scenes could have used more character. Hopefully, in the next
films in the series an action choreographer can be brought in to help
define the different styles and individualities that each character
would really have.  Lucas has also peppered the film with loving
references and tributes to earlier films and influences.  One
marvelous (and blatant) scene is when Qui-Gon uses his light saber to
melt through a series of metal doors on the Trade Federation ship. The
scene wonderfully recreates the famous climax of "Forbidden Planet",
wherein, the invisible Creature from the Id, melts through the
impenetrable doors of the Krell lab to get at it's victims.
This brings me to what I found to be the weakest thread in the film,
and that is the performance by Jake Lloyd as Annakin Skywalker. While
I can see the plotting that is taking place, some of Annakin's scenes
do not work simply because they are either too abrupt or Lloyd's
performance is not tuned well enough to embrace it. The most jarring
moment comes when Annakin agrees to leave his Mother, Shmi Skywalker
(Pernilla August) to go with Qui-Gon to the Jedi counsel. The
emotional drama and angst here is almost non existent, being brought
to it's conclusion with the dialogue exchange of Annakin: 'Will I ever
see you again?"  Shmi: "What does your heart tell you?!"  While it
fits into the mythology, it doesn't fit into the drama of the scene.
The structure of the film is similar to "Return of the Jedi". In fact,
in retrospect it seems that 'Return of the Jedi' was the template for
the film. The differences between the two are the depth with which the
political drama is played out. For this reason "The Phantom Menace" is
a richer film.
I must comment on the negative quotient of the film. There have been
several vocal reviews of the film. Some valid, some not. Some
reviewers have gone out of their way to disdain the film simply for
the sake of it. I recall back in 1977, with the release of the first
'Star Wars' that most critics praised the film for its special effects
but disliked the poor characterizations and performances.  One critic,
David Sheenan even claimed that the film served no purpose other than
to show how to choreograph laser beams and explosions. That being
said, I must say that while some have not enjoyed the film as much as
others have, that is no fault of the film. There has to be a certain
suspension of disbelief involved. And for some (especially those that
do not care for Sci-fi or fantasy) is equivalent to lifting an anchor
over their heads.
Now for all intents and purposes, is 'The Phantom Menace' a good
film. Yes! Is it the best 'Star Wars' movie. No. "The Empire Strikes
Back" still holds that distinction. Now is this film a worthy
successor. Yes. In fact "The Phantom Menace" manages to do something
that no other film in recent years has been able to do. Take us to a
place and time we've never been before and make it seem familiar.
On a scale of 1 to 5, 'STAR WARS EPISODE 1: THE PHANTOM MENACE" rates
4 stars. A good forebear of things to come and a marvelous return to
classic filmmaking with new and wondrous technology.
Copyright 1999 R. L Strong
All rights reserved Nothing in this article may be quoted or re-printed without
the express written permission of the author.
--
Visit the Dungeonmaster Cornucopia of Film
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Makeup/5594/reviews/main.html

Title
Review for Timecode (2000)
Rated R: for adult language, sexual situations, homosexuality, and
violence. 93 minutes. Release: 2000
There are those experiences in our lives that impact on all of those
around us. Mike Figgis, who created the cinematic benchmark "Leaving
Las Vegas" has crafted a revolutionary form of cinema. Unfortunately,
the story being told is not as daring as the technique being used.
The film opens in the office of a Psychiatrist (Glenne Headly) as Emma
Green (Saffron Burrows) relates a dream in which her husband has a
small wound in his side. He is bleeding badly but is not upset by the
wound, he is almost comforted by it. Emma is concerned that her
husband is having an affair, as their marriage is deteriorating.
We are next introduced to Lauren Hathaway (Jeanne Tripplehorn) as she
leaves her home, stopping in her driveway to tamper with the tire on
her girlfriend's car. As Rose (Selma Hayek) gets to her can and
notices the flat, Lauren offers to give her a ride to her audition.
Again the suspicion of infidelity is brought up. Lauren questions Rose
with her suspicions. Rose is adamant in her innocents. Lauren relaxes
and the relationship seems to be back on track. But Lauren's
suspicions are still potent. It is when she manages to place a small
radio transmitter into Rose's purse that the truth starts to unfold.
Finally we meet Alex Green (Stellan Skarsgĺrd) a Motion Picture
Producer who is having a nervous breakdown while his partner Evan
Wantz (Xander Berkeley) tries to negotiate a deal with up and coming
Director Lester Moore (Richard Edson). As the plot develops we learn
of the inter-relationships between all of these characters, and how
these relationships affect others on the periphery of the tale.
The revolutionary style used to tell this rather simple tale of moral
breakdown is what makes the film so compelling. Shot entirely in one
continuous take with four digital video cameras, the film is projected
in four equal panels. The screen takes on the appearance of a window
pane, with each major character (or their immediate environment) being
the subject of each panel. Each of these four panels conveys a single
story from four distinct views all set in real time. And there are
many moments where the action (s) cross over into other panels,
creating a montage of time and drama that is invigorating.
The screen is set up as such: Emma Green's (Saffron Burrows) story
takes place on the upper right hand of the screen. Lauren Hathaway's
(Jeanne Tripplehorn) tale is on the upper left. Alex Green's (Stellan
Skarsgĺrd) drama is played out on the lower right corner, while Rose's
(Selma Hayek) comprises the lower left. What may seem to be a
difficult method of carrying out a narrative, is surprisingly simple.
Director Figgis uses sound to direct the audience to the pertinent
story panel. Not once during the course of the film does the story
become muddled or convoluted. The only moment of theatricality in the
film is a plot device of a series of earthquakes (there are four in
all, one for each major character). While superficially, this seems to
be simply a devise to show off the timing between the four cameras, it
actually reflects an emotional tide that each individual character is
experiencing. But the effect is more intrusive than it needs to be.
Now the technique of "split-screen" is not new. Several Directors have
used the technique to embellish their films for short sequences, most
notably Brian DePalma ("Sisters", "Phantom of the Paradise" and "Blow
Out"). Only one other film has used the 'split-screen' for a complete
movie and that was Richard L. Bare's disastrous "Wicked, Wicked"
(1973). Also being shot in one continues take (with no edits), the
film calls to mind Alfred Hitchcock's "Rope" (which actually did have
edits but were cleverly hidden by either furniture or the actors
themselves crossing in front of the camera).
The performances in the film are remarkable in that all of the actors
had to improvise their scenes. Director Figgis only gave his actors an
outline and plot points for his story, letting the actors natural
creativity and intuition carry their performances. The standout
performances in the film are by Jeanne Tripplehorn, Selma Hayek,
Stellan Skarsgĺrd, Holly Hunter and Julian Sands (as a Hollywood
Massage Guru).
The problem here is that with so much going on, it is hard to focus on
any one character. Not to say that the story is muddled. But it is
simplistic for a mystery, and too technically complex for a comedy.
While the film is invigorating and compelling in its execution, its
story is not. Mike Figgis is a unique filmmaker, his aforementioned
"Leaving Las Vegas" was a revelation of style and characterization.
"Time Code" is a fascinating film in and of itself. I'll be interested
to see what Mr. Figgis does next.
Owned & Copyright Š 2000 R. L. Strong
Nothing in this article may be quoted or re-printed without the
expressed written permission of the author.

Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)
ARTISEN ENTERTAINMENT PRESENTS A HAXAN FILM PRODUCTION
A FILM BY DANIEL MYRICK & EDUARDO SÁNCHEX   "THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT"
HEATHER DONAHUE   MICHAEL C. WILLIAMS   JOSHUA LEONARD
ORIGINAL MUSIC BY TONY CORA
EXECUTIVE PRODUCERS: KEVIN J. FOXE, BOB EICK
CINEMATOGRAPHY BY NEAL FREDERICKS
PRODUCED BY ROBIN COWIE & GREGG HALE
EDITED, WRITTEN & DIRECTED BY DANIEL MYRICK AND EDUARDO SÁNCHEZ
Never underestimate the gullibility of the American Psyche. We want
our ghosts.  We need our government cover-ups and conspiracies. We
lust for an Extraterrestrial implant. And a lot of us really expect to
win the lottery. From this collective wanting of something unique and
otherworldly, comes the current flavor of the month "The Blair Witch
Project", a marvelously adept film representation of the old shell
game. Much hype and effort has gone into creating the "legend"
surrounding this film. There are individuals who earnestly believe in
the story of three film students who have mysteriously disappeared.
But for all the attentive hyperbole and inventiveness, what does the
movie have to offer. That is an interesting question, because without
the hype or the backstory (or the ingenious marketing strategy), 'The
Blair Witch Project' would not be as successful at raising the hackles
of most of it's viewers.
The film opens on a black screen. Fading up is the (now) famous
tagline for the film:
In October of 1994, three student filmmakers disappeared in the woods
near Burkittesville, Maryland, while shooting a documentary.
One year later, their footage was found.
With what has been seen before in the news reports about the film and
the mock documentary, this opening credit manages to create an air of
foreboding.
The film is basically a reconstruction from the discovered Video, Film
and Audio recordings of Heather Donahue, Michael C. Williams and
Joshua Leonard who have left home for Burkittesville, Maryland to
shoot a short documentary on the legend of the Blair Witch. We see
some interesting interviews with some of the locals of Burkittesville,
talking about the legend and the history of the curse.
As the three filmmakers march into the woods, tensions begin to
mount. Being ill prepared for any real camping experience, the three
young people are soon lost and bickering amongst themselves. This
slowly escalates into terror, as during the nights they are wakened by
strange noises, that seems to emanate from all around them.
As their terror and anxiety grows, Heather Donahue tries valiantly to
remain in control of the small group.  Unfortunately, her growing
self-doubt and insecurity is fuels by the constant bickering from both
Joshua Leonard and (especially) Michael Williams. When they loss (?!)
their map, all reason is lost. The students wander aimlessly in
circles, returning to the same campsite that they had left earlier
that morning.
That night after much noise and chasing of unseen visitors, Joshua
disappears.  Now Heather is seized with fear. Michael now has to serve
as the leader, something he seems suddenly capable of doing.  Again,
more noises during the night, followed by the discovery of a strange
totem left outside of their tent, which is tied together with remnants
of Joshua's clothing. Concealed inside are the visual remains of
something possibly human, possibly animal. Now all hope expires as
Heather has a breakdown, confessing to her video camera that she is
responsible for what has happened.  The film climaxes with the
discovery of an abandoned house, it's interior walls covered with the
dirty (bloody?) handprints of children.
What "The Blair Witch Project" has managed to do, with no lack of
inventiveness, is to re-invent the marketing champagne for
movies. Since the development of the Internet, motion picture
companies had used the World Wide Web as another marketing tool. You
can download trailers and bios of your favorite stars and view behind
the scene video clips from any number of movies. What has happened
with the "Blair Witch" is the creation of an advertisement that seems
not to be an advertisement.  The film in and of itself is remarkably
well done, in an amateurish cinema verité method. Unfortunately,
the constant videotape use calls into question the rational of the
participants. Why would you continue filming yourself washing your
hand in a stream to remove the blood from it, as it revolts you. Most
people would at least put the camera down (or drop it). But not
Heather, she is the consummate filmmaker. Willing to die (literally)
for her art. The use of the actors themselves as the camera men is not
so revolutionary, having been used to frightening effect in the little
seen film "THE LAST BROADCAST" (1998). The mock documentary style has
been a staple of Italian gore/cannibal films since the early 70's. But
what makes the 'Blair Witch' so involuntary is that there seems to be
no real direction of the actors. One does buy into the mythology after
a while, and being so immersed in this universe, can help but be
dragged along.
As a horror film, "The Blair Witch Project" is unique in that at a
time when prosthetic effects and cosmetics have become so realistic,
this film eschews them in favor of the old Val Lewton approach. What
you don't see is psychologically more terrifying than anything
visual. Your imagination can fill in the blanks much more clearly than
any effects master could. The Mise-En-Scéne of the woods decorated
with the totems hanging from every branch is remarkably foreboding,
giving the viewer a level of unease that cannot be easily shaken
off. Also the music by Tony Cora is along the lines of the subtle
tones and noises used in Tobe Hooper's 'Texas Chainsaw Massacre',
(another film that plumped the psychological well for it's
effectiveness)
Now, let's get one thing straight. No one really died here. In fact
Michael Williams is currently working on another film (a big budget
item). Heather has also been cast in another project. These young
people are professional actors.  The mythology of the 'Blair Witch' is
a complete fabrication. This is the stuff of urban legends. We've all
heard stories of headless ghosts wandering through wooden glades, or
businesses built on possible Indian (or Spanish) burial ground. All
nice little stories to help the kids get a poor night's sleep.  What
Directors Daniel Myrick & Eduardo Sánchez have done here is create
a marvelously deft psychological test for the masses. Without the
attentive mythology and aggressive hype, their film would not be
anywhere near as accessible or successful.
On it's own; the film is painfully slow. There is far too much 'shaky
cam' work being done, giving many viewers a disorienting
experience. For the most part this works in raising expectations from
the viewers that something is about to happen. The film is riff with
false starts. While the editing is remarkable efficient, it sometimes
works against itself, as whenever we jump from video to 16 millimeter
film and back within a short scene. But again, this has the desired
neurological effect of persuading the viewer. The film almost becomes
an inkblot or Thematic Apperception Test with it's continual viewing
of the woods, especially at night when the lack of light and
preponderance of shadow creates it's own images. Most interesting of
all is that the film is presented in an aspect ratio of 1.33:1,
basically the same ratio as your television set. This gives the film
another level of psychological immediacy, making the film seem
real. We're used to seeing films projected on a big, wide screen. This
film instead creates a field of view that is limited from the start,
as the peripheral area of the screen is blank. Whether this film will
work as well on home video is a question that waits to be answered.
This is a hard film to review. One cannot separate the promotion of
the film from the film itself. They are so intertwined with one
another as to be symbiotic, feeding off of each other. It will be
interesting to see the promotion that is used to market the film's
video release.
So on a scale of one to five stars, "The Blair Witch Project" gets two
ratings.  The film itself gets only 2˝.  But the promotion,
mythology and film together get a 4. "The Blair Witch Project" is not
so much a film, as it is what the title really implies. It is a
PROJECT!
Copyright Š 1999 R. L. Strong
Nothing in this article may be quoted or re-printed without the expressed
written permission of the author.

Title
Review for Fight Club (1999)
"This is your life, and it's ending one minute at a time."
1999 is going to be noted as just possibly the most self reflective
year of motion pictures. So far we had 'American Beauty', 'Three
Kings', 'The Matrix', 'Anywhere But Here', all films dealing in one
way or another with the issue of self worth and identity. Director
David Fincher now adds his two cents to the debate and comes up with
an equally interesting parable of human angst and social breakdown.
Edward Norton stars as 'The Narrator', we never know (or recognize his
real name), but suffice to say that he is a troubled man. Suffering
from chronic insomnia, The Narrator is stuck in a job he hates, a
daily life of loneliness and despair. He joins support groups, under
the guise of illness or impending death in an attempt to feel
something, anything. He quickly becomes addicted to this method of
emotional dependence, moving almost nightly from one group to another.
His world is invaded though by another emotional tourist, Marla Singer
(Helena Bonham Carter), a suicidal waif living on the edge of society.
The Narrator is both intrigued and repelled by this woman, who cheats
and steals, scratching out an existence while the Narrator struggles
with his daily grind and catalogue furnished home. Unable to deal with
someone else copying his subterfuge, He confronts Marla with her
charade. She returns the indictment.
Unable to deal with the loss of his support, The Narrator plunges into
his work. He travels, investigating auto defects for a major car
manufacturer. His job is to weigh the costs between possible lawsuits
and a mass recall for defective parts. On one of his flights he meets
up with Tyler Durder (Brad Pitt), a sociopathic cross between William
S. Burroughs and Deepak Chopra.
When the narrator returns home, he finds that his condo has been
destroyed in an explosion and fire. Everything he owns has been
destroyed. At first he attempts to call Marla, but unable to deal with
her honesty, he instead calls Tyler. The two men meet at a bar, when
The narrator finally, after prompting asks if he can stay with Tyler.
Tyler agrees on one condition. He asks the Narrator to hit him as hard
as he can!
The two men fight, creating a strange and primitive bound between
them.
Moving in with Tyler, the narrator finds that the living conditions
are much less than he could ever have expected. The home that Tyler
lives in is anything but livable. Water floods the basement, walls and
stairs are crumbling, and everything is in disrepair. From here Tyler
and the Narrator start to become brothers, getting other lost and
soulless men to join them in their search for self awareness through
pain and anarchy.
"Fight Club" is a daring film. It is both a hard edge action film and
diatribe against violence. Anarchy rules in this film, more so than
any other in recent years. The only analogous film could possibly be
George Romero's 'Dawn of the Dead' (another film that skirted the
issue of consumerism as a disease). What "Fight Club" does and does
brilliantly, is to shine a farcical light into the face of society's
obsession with feeling good about one's self. Director David Fincher
and Screenwriter Jim Uhls have crafted a thought provoking morality
tale of self abuse for the 12 step generation.
Jim Uhls' script base on the book by Chuck Palahniuk,, is a clever
piece of writing. Tyler's soliloquies and bullshit Zen are so absurd
as to be the real thing. In this universe, it makes sense to beat
yourself senseless physically, because "self improvement is
masturbation.. self destruction is the answer" The film is a complex
character study that leads the viewer through an almost subliminal
Rorschach test. So many scenes play out with double meaning that the
final denouncement is both expected and surprising.
David Fincher has crafted his most extreme film. Using graphic close
ups, computer manipulation, visual effects, Dutch angles and quick
cuts, Fincher has created a filmic representation of his lead
character. Everything here is seen through The Narrator's eyes, even
in the third person. This is almost as shocking a device as what
Robert Montgomery did with his directorial debut "Lady in the Lake"
(1947).
Admittedly, the film does shift gears half way through the film. Those
expecting a tale about men engaging in bare knuckle fights (ala the
Charles Bronson film "Hard Times" (1975)) are bound to be
disappointed. This is a film about much loftier ideas. As Fight Club
escalates into a terrorist organization, it becomes less focused on
the individual battles, and more focused on The Narrator's realization
of his own mania, while the group of fighters around him become more
autonomous. It is only when one of their members is killed during an
extreme act of vandalism, that the Narrator forces the group to
recognize the fallen man's name. This becomes a mantra, in death you
have a name. There is victory in Death. There is identity in Death.
The Narrator rebels, putting his own life in jeopardy. He has done
everything he could to eliminate his seemingly boring and self
absorbed life, and finally has to fight for that life, as his own Id
fights to stop him.
The performances of the film are all stellar. Edward Norton casts a
frighteningly real presents of a man who has reached his limits. Mr.
Norton manages to make his character both humorously vulnerable and
frighteningly mundane. His character goes through a radical
realization, that he is not the man he thought he was.
Brad Pitt as Tyler Durden swaggers and stomps through his part,
commanding every inch of the frame that he inhabits. Pitt has never
been so forceful or relaxed in his performance, possibly his best turn
outside of Terry Gilliams' "The 12 Monkeys". His character is both
attractive and frightening in almost a reversal of Norton's character.
Helena Bonham Carter makes her character of Marla Singer a streetwise
urchin of noble madness. Here is a woman who has accepted her plight
and her mania and deals with it. Seeing through most of the hypocrisy
around her. Her relationship with both Tyler and The Narrator is both
complex and puzzling, which leads to the fascinating but not unseen
denouncement.
The best performance is from singer/ actor Meat Loaf Aday as Robert
Paulson. A victim of testicular cancer, Robert has developed mammary
sized breasts as a result of his steroid abuse and the hormones used
in his treatment. His character has literally and figuratively fused
both the masculine and feminine aspects of male life into one
shockingly absurd personality. A fine and daring performance.
The photography by Jeff Cronenweth is wondrously bleak. Never has self
absorption been so accurately portrayed  cinematically. Emblazoned
with numerous visual and computer effects, the photography becomes an
extension of the characters, almost eclipsing them in fact. The film
is both dense and shallow in its pallet of color. The only hue that
really jumps off the screen is red. Not just the color of blood, but
rage, embarrassment, confusion, and depravation. "Fight Club" is truly
one of the most cinematic films of recent years.
To summarize, "Fight Club" is not a film for everyone. It was never
(obviously) intended to appeal to a wide spectrum. A film that speaks
about loss and self denial and apathy in ways that is both disturbing
and humorous. The message of the film could, I feel, be best summed up
by the lyrics of John Lennon.. "You don't know what you've got, 'till
you lose it!". A hard edged film, that laughs at our foibles and mocks
our choices. Politically incorrect and insensitive.  A hard film to
forget.

Title
Review for High Fidelity (2000)
"HIGH FIDELITY"
**** out of *****
Review By R.L. Strong
Rated R for language and sexual situations.
TOUCHSTONE PICTURES PRESENTS A WORKING TITLE FILMS PRODUCTION IN
ASSOCIATION WITH DOGSTAR FILMS/ NEW CRIME PRODUCTIONS A STEPHEN FREARS
FILM   JOHN CUSACK "HIGH FIDELITY" JACK BLACK   LISA BONET   JOELLE
CARTER   JOAN CUSACK  SARA GILBERT   IBEN HJEJLE  TODD LOUISO   LILI
TAYLOR  NATASHA GREGSON WAGNER   MUSIC BY HOWARD SHORE   COSTUME
DESIGNER LAURA CUNNINGHAM BAUER FILM EDITING MICK AUDSLEY
PRODUCTION DESIGNERS DAVID CHAPMAN   THERESE DEPREZ     DIRECTOR OF
PHOTOGRAPHY  SEAMUS McGARVEY,B.S.C.     CO-PRODUCERS JOHN CUSACK  D.V.
DeVINCENTIS  STEVE PINK    EXECUTIVE PRODUCERS MIKE NEWELL   ALAN
GREENSPAN  LISA CHASIN    PRODUCED BY TIM BEVAN   RUDD SIMMONS   BASED
ON THE NOVEL BY NICK HORNBY     SCREENPLAY BY D,V, DeVINCENTIS & STEVE
PINK &  JOHN CUSACK AND SCOTT ROSENBERG     DIRECTED BY STEPHEN FREARS
What are the top 5 best films of the year 2000. Well, admittedly its
still too early to start calling the shots. But be prepared for this
funny and charming little gem from director Stephen Frears, as it
already has my attention.
The story if about Rob Gordon (John Cusack), a thirty-something
entrepreneur and owner of a small used record store in downtown
Chicago. Now, Rob has a problem and that is, Laura (Iben Hjejle) his
live in girl friend of several years has moved out. Rob, heartbroken
and introspective tries to re-evaluate his love life.
That plot line, in and of itself is pretty nondescript. What makes
this film so enjoyably fresh is the marvelous script by Mr.'s
DeVincentis, Pink, Cusack, and Rosenberg. John Cusack as Rob Gordon
breaks the cinematic third wall, conversing with the audience
throughout the film. His self examination is both poignant and
revelatory. We are witness to a man, who has been unwilling to face
his life, coming to terms with his adolescence and his own immaturity.
Rob Gordon is just such a fascinating, human character. And Cusack's
performance is one of his best, equaling his turns in 'Grosse Point
Blank' and (one of my favorite films) 'Say Anything'.
There are so many surprises in the film, including but not limited to
uncredited performances by Tim Robbins (as Ian Raymond) and Catherine
Zeta-Jones (as former girlfriend Charlie Nicholson). But performances
are wonderfully timed comic turns, with Ms. Zeta-Jones turning a
trophy lover into a bittersweet shrew. The rest of the cast is also
remarkably good, with special credit to Jack Black (famed co-creator
of the fictional acoustic punk group 'Tenacious D'), who turns in one
of the funniest characters in recent years. What makes Barry (Jack
Black) so funny is that we recognize him immediately. Most of us have
had to deal with a retail clerk whose self importance and superiority
were insufferable, and Jack Black's performance is hilariously on
target in both its accuracy and self depreciation.
Lisa Bonet (as singer Marie DeSalle) is a revelation, both for her
performance and her singing (Her performance of "Baby, I Love Your
Way" is a revelation). This is a grand surprise and a welcome one.
Iben Hjejle as Laura has a soulful and graceful quality that lights up
the screen. Her performance is the emotional heart of the film. And as
such, gives greater resonance to Rob's acceptance of adulthood and
responsibility.
The screenplay by D.V. DeVincentis, Steve Pink, John Cusack and Scott
Rosenberg is both knowingly funny and insightful. There is not a
wasted line or scene. Every moment of the film brings with it new
information to each of the characters and their situations. This may
just possibly be the best screenplay of this year. I cannot remember
any film recently (save for those by Woody Allen) that treats all of
its characters with such aplomb. Not even the most minor of supporting
roles is without its truth and honesty. And mention must be made of
some of the funniest and wittiest dialogue since 'Grosse Point Blank'
(also co-written by Mr.'s DeVincentis, Pink, and Cusack).
Stephan Frears (who's underrated "The Van" rates as one of 1996's best
films), has another grand inclusion to his resume here. His direction
of the film is marvelously subtle and subversive. Taking the technique
of breaking the barrier of the screen from 'Ferris Bueller's Day Off',
he reinvents it. Using it to force the audience to identify and
sympathize with the character of Rob Gordon. The mise-en-scčne, strewn
with vinyl records and classic music, ranging from the '13th Floor
Elevators' "You're Gonna Miss Me" to a cameo by Bruce Springsteen as
an imaginary "pop" psychologist; is wondrous. I only hope that the
AcademyŽ has a long memory come nomination time in 2001.
In conclusion, "High Fidelity" is one of the best surprises of the
pre-summer season. This is a film that will be laughed at and with. A
knowing and thoughtful film that will entertain anyone who's ever been
in love and lost. And knows all of the best songs to listen to while
they recover.
Owned and Copyright Š 2000 R.L. Strong
Nothing in this article may be quoted or re-printed
without the express written permission of the author.

Title
Review for Bone Collector, The (1999)
UNIVERSAL PICTURES AND COLUMBIA PICTURES PRESENT A BREGMAN PRODUCTION
DENZEL WASHINGTON  ANGELICA JOLIE  "THE BONE COLLECTOR"  QUEEN LATIFA
* MICHAEL ROOKER * MIKE McGLONE * LUIS GUZMAN * LELAND ORSER  AND  ED
O'NEIL   ORIGINAL MUSIC BY CRAIG ARMSTRONG   EDITED BY WILLIAM HOY
PRODUCTION DESIGN BY NIGEL PHILLIPS   DIRECTOR OF PHOTOGRAPHY  DEAN
SEMLER  A.C.S   A.S.C.   BASED ON THE NOVEL BY JEFFREY DEAVER
PRODUCED BY MARTIN BERGMAN * LOUIS A. STROLLER  * MICHEAL BERGMAN
SCREENPLAY BY JEREMY IACONE   DIRECTED BY PHILLIP NOYCE
Imagine a story about a master sleuth, cut down in his prime left in a
state of immobility. He is called upon to help in the investigation of
a series of murders so vicious that the even the police are baffled.
Now add to that mix a young rookie cop, called upon by the paralyzed
investigator to assist him on the case. That simple little plot line
sounds like an intriguing idea for a thriller. Don't be fooled. 'The
Bone Collector' is one of the most maddeningly intelligence stifling
films since 1998's 'Lost In Space'. What makes the film even more
aggravating is the utter waste of a talented cast and crew.
Denzel Washington stars as Lincoln Rhyme, a quadriplegic former
Forensics specialist. Unable to move other than his eyes, his mouth
and one finger (no ventilators or catheters here?!), he wants to end
his life. His injury also causes seizures which may result in brain
death. His character is shown laying in his deluxe apartment (which
could house a small business, I didn't know cops were paid that much
in NYC), watching a peregrine falcon roosting on his window sill. The
bird seems to be an ally, watching over the detective; giving him the
strength to carry on.
When a powerful New York City businessman is found murdered, rookie
officer Amelia Donaghy (Angelina Jolie) is first to arrive on the
scene. Using a disposable camera she, documents the crime scene before
evidence is washed away by the rain. She discovers additional evidence
one the train tracks and single handedly stops the on-coming train
before it can destroy the clues. This exercise in examination and care
brings her to the attention of Rhyme, who has been called back into
service by his friends on the force, to the chagrin of Capt. Howard
Cheney (Michael Rooker). Urging Officer Donaghy to be his eyes on the
crime scene, an unusual partnership is started.
We are introduced to the killer almost immediately in the form of a
shadowy cab driver who has a toy monkey hanging from his rear view
mirror. One of the clues left at the murder scene (and at each murder
scene) is a small bone fragment, always in the most preposterously
difficult location, but always found. All of the clues are discovered,
including a series of small pieces of paper no bigger than a corner of
a postage stamp. All of these clues lead Officer Donaghy to the
discovery of a true crime book published in the early 1920's called
"The Bone Collector". The crimes being committed are exact duplicates
of the crimes detailed in the book, but no motive can be deduced. That
is until the maddeningly contrived and ridiculous ending, where Ryhme
is confronted by the serial killer who goes to great lengths to
explain his reasoning for the murders and why Ryhme was his primary
victim all along.
Now, to be certain; 'The Bone Collector' does have a grand amount of
atmosphere. The Cinematography by Dean Semler creates a New York so
seedy and forbidding as to possibly kill that states tourist industry
for the next decade. But the plotting of the film and the entire set
up is so convoluted and contrived that it plays like an accident. A
fine example is when searching an old bookstore, Officer Donaghy finds
the "Bone Collector" novel in the first place she looks, on the top
shelve four feet above her, in the second row, buried under several
other books. Now while the character's deductive powers are supposed
to be brilliant, this is taking it too far.
Also.. and this is a spoiler (so do not read this if you do intend to
see the film).
When the killer finally attacks Rhyme in his apartment, he takes so
long to explain his motives that Rhyme is able to finally regain
movement in his hand, enough so that he can operate his hospital bed
to collapse onto the villains hand. At that point, Rhyme is also able
to move his neck enough to deliver the final blow (which does not yet
end the attack). And of course, this just prolongs the climax long
enough for Officer Donaghy to save the day.
The film is so maddening, in that here you have some of the best
talent in film making working on a project so by the numbers, that it
becomes almost absurd. The clues are all pointless, they are set ups
that lead the police in the opposite direction of where they should be
looking. If this were a real example of NYPD investigative resources,
that the crime rates would be astronomical. Mayor Gulliani  should sue
Universal for defamation of local.
Director Philip Noyce (whose credits include the marvelously deft
"Dead Calm" and amusing Zatoichi remake "Blind Fury"), works with a
sure hand. He manages to draw such earnest performances from his
actors, that one could almost (almost), forget the plot contrivances
here. Unfortunately, the script by Jeremy Iocone is loaded with every
possible variation of the serial killer genre, that the film becomes a
template of scenes that never really coalesce into a whole film.
The performances are all very earnest. Angelina Jolie shines as
Officer Donaghy. Her growing maturity and revulsion at her work is
both honest and believable. Ditto Denzel Washington, who manages to
make us accept his physical condition as well as his desire for death.
The chemistry between these two stars is palpable, but unfortunately
even that is dissipated by the inclusion of a scene wherein Officer
Donaghy strokes Rhymes one good finger. That scene is so riff with
unsubtle sexual overtones that it's juvenile.
"The Bone Collector" is one film that should have been better. It
tries hard to be a variation of the film "Se7en", but only succeeds in
being a morbid and grotesque remake of a Umberto Lenzi giallo film. A
disappointing and ultimately disastrous film.
Š2000 Areles Delphian Dungeon/ R.L. Strong

Title
Review for Ringu (1998)
FINE LINE PICTURES PRESENTS
A KODAKAWA SHOTEN PUBLISHING COMPANY. LTD.PRODUCTION
Staring  NANAKO MATSUSHIMA   HIROYUKI SANADA   MIKI NAKATANI
Original Score by KENJI KAWAI
Executive Producer  MASATO HARA
Edited by  NOBUYUKI TAKAHASHI
Director of Photography JUNICHIRO HAYASHI
Based on the Novel by KOJI SUZUKI
Produced by TAKASHIGE ICHISE   SHINYA KAWAI   TAKANORI SENTO
Screenplay HIROSHI TAKAHASHI
Directed by HIDEO NAKATA
The state of the Horror genre in American films has been in dire
straits for the past 20 years. Several films have been heralded as the
savior of the genre. Films such as Wes Craven's "Scream" and "I Know
What  You Did Last Summer" really did nothing to revive the format. It
wasn't until last year with the release of "The Blair Witch Project"
and "The Sixth Sense" that horror films came back to the land of
box-office  success and audience acceptance. But the trend was
actually started back a year earlier with a small little film from the
Island of Japan.
Yes, you heard right the same country that gave us rubber monsters,
samurais masquerading as Italian cowboys, and Laser Discs. But there
has always been a tradition of lyrical and hypnotic horror from the
Island nation. Such regarded films as "Kaiden" and "Onibaba" both
revel in their story telling and ominous portrayal of dread. But for
the past 30 years, audiences have been fed so much carnage that it's
refreshing to find a film that deals in the subliminal and the
sublime.
"The Ring" (Japanese title: "Ringu") is such a film. Telling its tale
of supernatural revenge and atonement  with a leisurely pace and
atmosphere that almost cries out terror. This is not the school of
revulsion. Far from it, this is the realm of bad dreams and bad deaths
that come at you with inexorable finality. This is sublime terror that
cannot be withstood.
The film opens with Tomiko and her friend, two teenage girls spending
the evening together while Tomiko's  parents are at a baseball game.
Tomiko's friend relates the story of a young boy, who had watched a
strange videotape, wherein a old woman, pointing her finger at him
said he would die within a week. Tomiko remains silent as he friend
details the aftermath in which the boy received a phone call
immediately after viewing the tape. The voice on the phone said the
same thing. Tomiko asks her friend what happened to the boy. She
replies, "His parents found him dead. His mouth wide open, like he was
screaming". Tomiko lays down on the floor, her discomfort palpable.
Suddenly, her friend starts to laugh claiming the story is a joke.
Tomiko turns the tables on her friend claiming to have had the exact
same experience while on a camping trip. As her friend starts to
succumb to the fear inherent in the situation, Tomiko breaks down
laughing, replaying the joke.
Suddenly the phone rings! The two girls stop laughing and run down
stairs to answer it. Tomiko's friend  picks up the receiver. The call
turns out to be from Tomiko's Mother. The baseball game is going into
extra innings and they won't be home until late. Tomiko's friend runs
off to use the bathroom. Tomiko hangs up the phone, when the
television in the living room suddenly turns itself on. Tomiko slowly
walks into the room to turn the set off. Returning to the kitchen to
pour herself a drink, Tomiko feels something oppressive in the room.
She turns towards the television; her eyes grow wide in terror. She
screams.
Reiko Asakawa (Nanako Matsushima) is a journalist working on a story
for her television station concerning the urban legend of the cursed
videotape. Interviewing a group of schoolgirls, Reiko becomes immersed
in the tale. Returning home to her son, Koichi (Katsumi Muramatsu),
Reiko gets ready to visit her parents for  the funeral of her niece
Tomiko!
The tale of the curse videotape, formerly only an urban legend has now
become a personal issue for Reiko. Talking with some of Tomiko's
friends outside the home, it is learned that the girl visiting her
that night that she dies is now hospitalized in shock. Hearing that
two of Tomiko's friends died in a car the same evening, Reiko
investigates further. She searches Tomiko's room, finding a roll of
film from her camping trip. Taking the film for developing, Reiko
finds the resort the teenagers had stayed at. But another anomaly is
found on one of the photos. A group shot of all four teens, innocent
enough, except that faces are all distorted and warped.
Investigating the resort, Reiko finds the unlabeled videotape behind
the front desk. She asks the desk clerk about the four teens, but
without any real recollection other than they did not stay the night
they had paid for, there was nothing else strange about them. Reiko
goes to the cabin that her niece had stayed with her boyfriend and
watches the video. The television is first rife with static. But then,
smeared images of a woman brushing her hair in a mirror, someone with
a cloth covering their head, their finger pointing down towards the
bottom of the screen. Numerous other bizarre unconnected images
concluding with a view of a well in a small garden. Reiko turns off
the video. As she does the phone rings!!
Reiko returns home to her son. She is disturbed and uncomfortable. She
calls her ex-husband, Ryuji Takayama (Hiroyuki Sanada) a reporter for
a tabloid and a practicing psychic. Ryuji arrives at Reiko's home. He
stops outside as his son in going off to school. The two stand in
front of each other for a moment,  without exchanging a word. Koichi
goes on his way. Inside the home, Ryuji feels an ominous presence.
Skeptical about the urban legend, he asks to view the video. Reiko
produces the tape (having stolen it from the hotel). As Ryuji watches,
Reiko steps outside unable or unwilling to experience it again. Ryuji
steps outside and tells her, "It's over.. It's been five minutes. No
phone call."
Taking the tape to the Reiko's office, they examine it frame by frame
on a digital editor. Researching the image of the woman on the video,
they find that it is Mai Takano (Miki Nakatani). The only problem is
that Takano, a noted psychic died in the early 60's. The investigation
continues, leading to the Doctor who  brought Takano to Tokyo to
validate her claims of being a true psychic. With only days left
before Reiko may fall prey to the curse, the search for a way to
dispel the curse becomes even more serious when Koichi is urged to
view the video by the ghost of his cousin, Tomiko.
"The Ring" is a luxurious horror film. Director Hideo Nakata is to be
commended for constructing such a chilling and thought provoking film.
The imagery and use of space in the film continually closes in on the
viewer, giving one a continual feeling of claustrophobia. Almost
subliminally, reflections, shadows, and  spectral visions abound in
the periphery of the film. There is so much depth that one is
immediately pulled into the terror.
Nanako Matsushima as Reiko is just marvelous. This is one of the
finest performances I have seen this year. Her decent into terror is
too palpable to be ignored. As she is in almost every scene, she must
carry not only the plot of the film but its emotional depth. Hiroyuki
Sanada as Ryuji is also remarkably good, having to play the bitter
ex-husband part. His dissatisfaction with his marriage and his family
is frightening in and of itself. A loner blames everyone for it. In
essence, he is a psychic that cannot see into his own heart.
The script by Hiroshi Takahashi is such dark poetry that from the
first frame of the film to the final  denouncement, the feelings of
dread never let up. The characters are written with such detail to
their lives and relationships that they seem to be real people. The
film becomes almost a document, a diary if you would of these bizarre
and unfathomable circumstances. The structure of the film plays almost
like a dark detective story or supernatural noir, with clues being
found and dug out of the most desperate of places. The central idea of
an urban legend being true is nothing new, but in the hands of
Takahashi the material is raised to level of suspense and unease that
one cannot really appreciate until after the film has ended.
"The Ring" is without a doubt one of the most unique and frightening
films since "Night of the Living Dead". Unlike that film and other
horror films for the past 30 years, it does so without any gratuitous
scenes of violence of gore. There are a few brief moments of the
grotesque, but they are not handled in a manner that could be
considered exploitative. The subtlety of technique and story telling
make this film closer to Val Lewton territory than anything else in
memory. However, Lewton's films were never this disturbingly real or
close to home. By all cost see this film, this is the true beginning
of a renaissance, and a harbinger of horror films that we can honestly
enjoy and respect. With Fine Line films releasing "The Ring" sometime
this year, it has my vote for one of this years best films.
Copyright Š  2000 R. L. Strong
Nothing in this article may be reproduced or altered in any way
without the expressed written permission of the author.
Visit The Cornucopia of Film web site
email at Areles@geocities.com

Title
Review for Matrix, The (1999)
Warner Brothers Presents a Silvers Picture in association
with Village Roadshow    A Wachowski Brothers film
Keanu Reeves   Laurence Fishburne  "THE MATRIX"  Carrie-Anne Moss
Joe Pantoliano  Hugo Weaving   Co Producer  Dan Cracchiolo
Music by Don Davis  Cinematography by Bill Pope
Edited by Zach Staenberg  Special Effects  Matthew Ferro
Stunt co-ordinator  & Martial Arts Director  Yuen Woo-ping
Produced by Andrew Mason  Barrie M. Osborne  &  Joel Silver
Written & Directed by Andy Wachowski & Larry Wachowski
What if your reality wasn't real? That have been the several stories and
films that have utilized this construct. Titles as "Total Recall" and
"Blade Runner" jump immediately to mind as two example of such story lines.
But this production from Joel Silver does something unique and exciting.
Now I must warn you ahead of time, that if you want the surprises of "The
Matrix" to remain surprises, please skip the next two paragraphs, as I am
going to reveal aspects of the plot.
The film opens with a computer screen tracing a phone call to a computer
hacker named "Neo" (Keanu Reeves). The caller is a black leather clad
beauty named Trinity (Carrie-Anne Moss). The police locate her and close
in. Also arriving on the scene are several secret service types lead by
Agent Smith (Hugo Weaving), who warns the police that the Trinity is no
ordinary woman. That fact is brought to stunning light by Trinity's swift
and explosive decimation of the police officers (an absolutely jaw dropping
sequence of acrobatic and martial art dexterity). The film takes a drastic
turn as Trinity escapes her pursuers by leaping off from the roof of the
building and onto the roof of a second, covering an impossible space in the
leap. She reaches her extraction point, a lone phone booth, but is run down
by Agent Smith in a truck. Surprisingly, she does escape.. but how we can't
tell.
'Neo' is the computer tag used by Thomas Anderson. He is contacted by
Morpheus (Laurence Fishburn), a notorious cyber terrorist that the
government is trying to capture. Neo is contacted and meets with Morpheus
who tells him that his life is nothing but a dream. That his reality is
nothing more that electrical impulses fed to him by a sentient life form
built by man in the late '90's. This Artificial Intelligence (spiritual
cousin to both the Hal 2000 from '2001' and 'Cyberdyne Systems' from 'The
Terminator' films) has destroyed all of mankind and is now breading man to
be used only as a living battery. When 'Neo' awakes from his dream, he is
rescued by Morpheus and his followers and trained to become the savior that
they believe him to be.
"The Matrix" is the second film from the Wachowski Brothers, Andy and Larry
respectively. Their first film, the remarkably subtle and stylish "Bound"
gave only a hint of the level of expertise and experimentation these two
filmmakers possess. What has been achieved in 'The Matrix" is nothing short
of awe inspiring. The effects, stunts, cinematography all combine to create
a completely dizzying world of fantasy. One so complex and multi-layered as
to be almost acceptable. No faint praise here. While the film doles out
ladles full of action set pieces (each one more extravagant and jaw
dropping than the previous one), one never loses site of the plot
machinations of the characterizations in the film.
While some of the characters are given short shrift in the film, all of the
principles do a fine job of carrying their roles. Keanu does a fine job as
the savior 'Neo', his growing acceptance of his role in the salvation of
mankind is a nice turn by an actor that has been giving little if no
respect critically. Here, Keanu ups the ante, by learning and performing
some of the most striking Martial Art fights ever caught in an American
film. Credit for that goes to Hong Kong master Yuen Woo-ping, who not only
trained the actors in the basics of several fighting forms but also
designed and directed the fighting scenes. The remarkable thing is that
these scenes intersect with the body of the film so well, that Mr. Yuen
might not receive the credit deserved him.
Laurence Fishburne returns with a nicely tempered performance as Morpheus.
His style and grace hiding the desperate passion with a man who knows that
the truth is a lie. And that the restoration of that real truth may cost
him his life. Carrie-Anne Moss is given the least amount of character
development (which is an unfortunate situation of almost all action films),
and this is a shame as her screen presence is so magnetic. You believe this
woman could save the world all by herself. Joe Pantoliano (who worked with
the Wachowski Brothers on "Bound") is his ever sleazy self, giving the film
just the right touch of levity and menace.
Now in a film that is dealing with the end of mankind and spectacular
battle scenes, the question comes up as to how good are the effects. Well,
for the first time we have a film here that does justice to all of the many
Hong Kong and Japanese fantasies of super heroes and super men that we have
seen and chuckled at over the past decades. It may now be near impossible
to watch an Ultraman episode without thinking them as quaint at best and
horrendous at worse. The complex digital and miniature work done on this
film are simple a marvel to behold. There are actually scenes here that out
gun anything by John Woo or Ringo Lam.
The sound design of the film is ecstatic. I haven't been this enthralled
with sound effects and their affront on my senses since 'Star Wars'. I
can't think of anything recently that had me ducking and blinking
subconsciously as much as this film.
If movies are becoming nothing more than glorified roller coasters, then I
hope that all future action films use this feature as a blueprint and move
forward from here. Now we've all been bludgeoned with films that have sold
themselves on the basis of their effects or action. But, for just pure
unadulterated entertainment, you could do much, much worse than spending
two hours in 'The Matrix"
On a scale of one to five "The Matrix" rates a solid four. A good time at
the bijou, and a film that cries out for multiple viewings.
Copyright Š1999 Areles' Delphian Dungeon
Nothing in this article may be copied, reprinted
or altered in anyway without the expressed written
permission of the author.

Title
Review for Ma wing jing (1997)
Corey Yuen's latest film, "HERO" is notable on two fronts. First this is
the film to bring back the Shaw Brothers Studio back to the forefront of
film production. Secondly, the film is the re-discovery of Yuen Biao.
The film opens around the end of the Qin dynasty, when many immigrants
were making their way to Shanghai. Poverty and crime rule most of China.
A young man, Ma Wing Jing and his brother enter the fabled city and
become laborers at the pier. Tam See is the most powerful gangster in
town, having control of the center of the city and having an alliance
with the British Army. Wing Jing and See become friends during a
confrontation. Their friendship grows as both men start to realize their
dreams, Wing Jing's to be a powerful and wealthy man, and See to settle
down with a woman he can truly love.
Wing Jing meets the singer at the club (Jessica Hester) and falls in
love with her, not realizing that she is the star attraction. After
stealing her picture from a display, Wing Jing and his brother plot to
impress her. First they rob two foreigner's of their money and cloths,
and set up a midnight rendezvous. Unfortunately, Wing Jing has run afoul
of a rival gangster, Yeung Seung who has bribed the police in an effort
to gain control of See's night club. The two bothers are arrested and
held until they manage to escape just before dawn. Jessica, having
waited outside in the cold with her manager all night, gives up and
returns home. 
See decides to retire, he gives the night club to Wing Jing, as
repayment for saving his life during an attempted murder. See arranges
the trade and ask his lover (Valerie Chow) to take care of Wing Jing.
Unfortunately, she has sided with Yeung Seung.
The performances in the film are all top notch, with fine turns by
Takeshi Kaneshiro as Ma Wing Jing and Jessica Hester and Valerie Chow.
The comic turn by Yuen Wah, previously known as the mad Vietnamese in
Samo Hung's "EASTERN CONDORS", is a marvelous surprise. His gift for
comedy is marvelously understated and hilarious. The stand-out is by
Yuen Biao who returns to the screen after a string of disappointments,
with a stellar performance. His Tam See is a Triad boss who knows that
his time is coming to an end but still has the cunning and craft to
uphold his pride. His gangster is almost non-violent, in that he only
retaliates, never instigates violence. But when the time comes to fight,
Yuen Biao has never looked better.
Corey Yuen directs the film with a maturity and a sense of pacing that
has been lacking in Hong Kong movies as of late. The lighting,
cinematography and staging of the film are beautiful to watch. The
action scenes do not disappoint either. This is the most aggressive and
inventive martial art choreography I've seen in some time, actually
surpassing Jackie Chan's work in both 'Rumble in the Bronx' and 'First
Strike'. The special effects team deserves praise for a fantastic job of
making the impossible look possible. An early fight between Takeshi
Kaneshiro and Yuen Biao on the back of a horse is to be seen to be
believed. Also noteworthy is the score for the film, done in a
marvelously lush orchestral style, not representative of most Hong Kong
fare. I would dare to say it ranks as high as the scores for both
"Titanic" and "Rosewood" as best of the year.
All in all, "HERO" marks a grand return to filmmaking for Shaw Brothers.
This is the film that gives us faith that Hong Kong cinema is alive and
flourishing.

Title
Review for Romeo Must Die (2000)

"ROMEO MUST DIE"
Review by R.L. Strong
** out of *****
WARNER BROS. PRESENTS SILVER PICTURES PRODUCTION "ROMEO MUST DIE" JET
LI AALIYAH   ISAIAH WASHINGTON   RUSSELL WONG WITH DMX AND DELROY
LINDO CO-PRODUCED BY WARREN CARR  EDITED BY DEREK G. BRECHIN
PRODUCTION DESIGNED BY MICHAEL   DIRECTOR OF PHOTOGRAPHY GLEN
MACPHERSON, C.S.C.  EXECUTIVE PRODUCER DAN CRACCHIOLO   MUSIC BY
STANLEY CLARKE AND TIMBALAND   STORY BY MITCHELL KAPNER SCREENPLAY BY
ERIC BERNT AND JOHN JARRELL   PRODUCED BY JOEL SILVER AND JIM VAN
WYCK   DIRECTED BY ANDRZEJ BARTKOWIAK
Rated R for violence and language. 158 minutes  Scope (2.35:1)
Hong Kong cinema has been going through a bad spell. The last few
productions have been effect laded action adventures that combine both
the best and worst of American filmmaking with the same qualities of
Hong Kong films. In a nutshell, the current crop of films from Hong
Kong has been maddeningly convoluted and visually sumptuous.
With the one time British colony reverting back to Mainland ownership,
a lot of Hong Kong's best talents have crossed the pacific to work on
U.S. productions. Such talents as Jackie Chan (Rush Hour), Chow
Yun-Fat (Anna & the King, The Corrupter) and Yuen Woo-Ping (The
Matrix) have all moved into the budget bloated world of Hollywood
filmmaking with mixed results. Now we can add two other Hong Kong
filmmakers to the mix with star Jet Li and Director and Fight
choreographer Corey Yuen Kwai. Unfortunately "Romeo Must Die" bears
all the trademarks of a typical Hollywood action film and none of Hong
Kong's rhythms.
The film opens in a nightclub as an Asian Couple is necking. Enter a
group of Chinese gangsters led by Kai Sing (Russell Wong). Kai
confronts Po Sing (Jon Kit Lee), the son of Kai's boss and leader of
the local Chinese family. A battle breaks out between the bodyguards
of the club and Kai, who handily kicks and punches his opponents down.
It's not until club owner Silk (rapper DMX), bears down on Kai and his
henchmen that the fight ends.
The following morning Po Sing is found dead. Suspicions escalate, as
Issac O'Day (Delroy Lindo) is told of the murder. His concern that the
war between his and the Chinese family may explode and ruin his plans
to move out of the business of corruption and into a legitimate
venture. Issac implores his chief of security, Mac (Issiah Washington)
to watch after his son and daughter.
The scene shifts to a prison in China, where Han Sing (Jet Li) learns
of his brothers murder. He fights with the guards and is dragged off
to be disciplined. Hung upside down by one foot, Han recovers and
battle his way out of custody in a blistering display of fight
choreography and stunt work. Escaping to the U.S. Han sets out to find
the person responsible for his brother's death.
"Romeo Must Die" is in many ways a fun film. It is both absurd and
assured. The basic plot of a gangster wanting to become legitimate
echoes "The Godfather". The relationship between Jet Li's Han and
Aaliyah's Trish O'Day reminds us of Abel Ferrera's "China Girl",
except that Romeo Must Die's couple never once exchange more than a
loving glance towards one another. Their romance is much more
puritanical than any other romance in film history.
The performances are adequate if not fully acceptable. Li, of course
has the showiest part, having to express both an innocents and
steadfast determination. Allayah, in her feature film debut manages to
carry what little is asked of her with a certain style and grace. It's
obvious that the camera loves her and she is very photogenic. But,
still the part is under written in such a way that even a poor
performance would not have affected it. Delro Lindo as Issac O'day
carries himself well in the film. An unsung and under appreciated
actor, Mr. Lindo turns out the films best performance. The other
performers are all adequate in what the script asks of them except for
D. B. Woodside as Issac's son, Colin. The performance is undirected,
with the character changing his tone and demeanor in accordance with
whatever location he is in. An unfocused performance that should have
been reigned in and / or better written.
First time director Andrzej Bartkowiak does a workmanlike job in
handling the film. Having a career as one of the industry's best
cinematographers, Bartkiwiak knows how to set up his shots, and "Romeo
Must Die" does look good. But the pacing of the film is lethargic,
only coming to a semblance of life during the fight scenes. The script
by Eric Bernt and John Jarrell is not focused in such a way that we
can care about the characters or the situations they are in. The big
gambit of buying up waterfront property to facilitate the building of
a sports center for a NFL team is needlessly confusing. And of course
the common practice of one character being the comic relief of the
film becomes painfully obvious here as Anthony Anderson as Allayah's
bodyguard, Maurice has no comic timing whatsoever.
The best things about the film are its fight scenes. Jet Li is a
master of these intricate physical battles. One needs only to see his
film "Fist of Legend" to understand that the man is without peer in
the realm of Martial Art combat. Here, Jet is given the opportunity to
show off in a way that "Lethal Weapon 4" (Jet's U.S. debut) didn't
allow. Unfortunately, a lot of Jet's fights are aided with computer
effects that detract from his ability and precision. Also "Romeo Must
Die" must be noted as having the most singularly useless effect ever
committed to film, and that is an x-ray effect that appears three
times during the course of the film, showing the effect of bone
crushing blows on an opponent. Obviously a homage to the famed x-ray
scene from Sonny Chiba's "Streetfighter", the scenes here are just
pointless and interfere with the pacing of the film. It's as if the
film has stopped and a video game has been inserted.
One problem though about the fight scenes. Those that are familiar
with Hong Kong action know that even though the films are fantasies
and are as removed from reality as any anime or cartoon. They do have
an internal rhythm to them. A heartbeat, so to speak in their
choreography. The fight scenes in a Hong Kong film breath with an
emotional resonance. This is created by the performance, the direction
and the editing. Here in "Romeo Must Die", there is no staccato. Every
fight scene, even though technically adroit and amazing becomes boring
as the editing both cuts away from battle at hand and simple follows a
set pattern. The rhythm is monotonous. A Hong Kong film has a tempo
that changes, heightening its emotional impact. 'RMD' is limited to a
standard 4/4 tempo, not allowing for any emotional content whatsoever.
A fine example of this difference can be found by examining a couple
of Jackie Chan's films.. watch the restaurant fight from the film
"Rush Hour" and notice that the context of the fight, while
technically amazing is rather flat (the framing and cut always do not
help). Now look at the warehouse fight from "Rumble in the Bronx".
There you have a heartbeat, and emotional draw that doesn't let the
audience catch its breath. The stops and pauses for dramatic effect
work perfectly, causing the viewer to be both astounded and
flabbergasted. Here in 'Romeo Must Die', the fight scenes have no more
emotional content or character than any John Wayne barroom brawl.
Jet Li is a grand and personable screen presence. it's a shame that
his full talents were not used to full effect here. One day filmmakers
here in the U.S. will stop making films by the numbers and start to
embrace the style and emotion that has made Hong Kong action pictures
such a commodity. Until then, we'll be left with emotionally hollow
product like "The Replacement Killer" and, currently "Romeo Must Die".
Owned and Copyright Š 2000 R.L. Strong
Nothing in this article may be quoted or re-printed without the
express written permission of the author.

Title
Review for Batman & Robin (1997)
In the continuation of Warner Brother's franchise, Joel Schumacher has
successfully killed this cash cow. What makes this film such a grand
disappointment is the tremendous line up of talented people involved
with the film.
Avika Goldsman's screenplay is such a cluttered mess that there is no
suspense built from one scene to another. This coming on the heals of
such a marvelously written project as "THE CLIENT" is such a shock that
it gives rise to thoughts that the latter film was a fluke.  Situations
are developed and executed with no thought of reason other that to get
the characters from one point to another. This is most glaringly brought
to point by the appearance of Alicia Silverstone's BATGIRL, who just
happens to be Alfred's niece.
The story of Dr. Victor Freeze is told almost completely in dialogue as
an afterthought. While working on a cure for a tragic decease contracted
by his wife, Dr. freeze is injured during a cryogenic procedure, and
becomes a man who can only survive in a sub zero environment. Now of
course he has become a terrorist intent on turning the world into a
frozen planet where only he can live. 
Now the logic of that little sub-plot escapes me. If Mr. Freeze wanted
to find a cure for his wife and bring her back from the brink of death,
why would he want to have her live in a world with no warmth. This is
indeed a cold hearted man. The development of POISON IVY is no less
contradictory. She wants to breed a form of plant life that can defend
itself like an animal. She joins with Mr. Freeze in his plan to start a
new ice age, destroying all animal life, therefore giving her plant
creations no reason to have the defense mechanism she had been trying to
breed into them. The characters have no logic. 
Batman of course is no longer the Dark Knight of the earlier films. Now
that he has an adoptive son in Burt Ward / Robin, Bruce Wayne is trying
to be a Father figure, constantly spouting out homilies about family and
relationships, while at the same time not really having any. George
Clooney tries in vain to keep from rolling his eyes while reciting the
dialogue given him. To say that his performance is workman-like is to be
generous. His best performances are still on "E.R.".
Bruce Wayne has the most unromantic evening with his girlfriend (played
by Elle Macpherson) , that it brings into question Bruce's latent
homosexuality. There is no spark and no passion (as there was for Nicole
Kidman's psychologist in "Batman Forever") between Bruce and anyone
other than Alfred. And even that relationship is very reserved.
Robin comes off less charismatic that in the last film in the series.
Now he's just a spoiled kid. In "Batman Forever", Burt Ward wanted to be
Batman's partner and friend. Now, Robin is suffering from Ego
deficiency. Robin's attraction for Poison Ivy is not believable, except
for a boy around the age of 15. His later flirtation with Batgirl smacks
of incest, even though they are not related in a traditional sense.
Chris O'Donnell, once considered a rising star, successfully burns up on
reentry with this performance. His Robin needs nothing more than a good
spanking. 
The less said about Alicia Silverstone's performance the better. This
talented young actress reads her lines with all the aplomb of a dubbing
actor for a Godzilla film. She was cast strictly for her commercial
value and she knew it. 
This brings us to the villains. Arnold Scharzenegger walks through his
part with all the concern of someone waiting for payday. The most
rediculous scene is during Mr. Freeze's imprisonment. The guards are at
least a foot taller that Arnold and yet fall at his hand in one of the
most unbelievable fights scenes caught on film. It's almost as ludicrous
as seeing Michael Jackson as a gang member.
Umu Thurman struts and coos her way through her part, showing a growing
discomfort with her sex symbol status. Her Poison Ivy has all the come
hither sex appeal of May West in "Sextette" (1978). 
The only performances worthy of notice are Pat Hingle and Michael Gough.
These two seasoned veterans carry their scenes with a dignity sorely
lacking from the rest of the film. 
Without going through the intricacies of the plot, there is one question
that always comes to mind with this series (except for the first
"BATMAN"), and that is how do these super villains manage to hire so
many thugs only to abandon them at the final reel. Mr. Freeze is
introduced with a team of hockey playing hoodlums that seem to have
stepped out of an old KISS music video. Every villain (even the minor
ones) have to have a LOOK, no one can be an individual with day glow
paint on their face or some sort of elaborate costume. 
With this film, Warner Brothers has succeeded in retrograding the series
back to it's TV incarnation. The only thing missing from the action
scenes are the superimposed titles detailing the POWs!, GWAAAA's, and
CLANG's associated with the old series. You almost wonder if William
Dozier, producer of the TV series is collecting royalties from this
film.
The special effects (by John Dykstra) and Production Design (by Barbara
Ling) are the primary stars of this film. And it is a case of
extravagance in the pursuit of nothing. Every set, from Ivy's lair, the
Batcave, to Freeze's hideout is set with enough neon and fiberglass to
keep the EPA in paperwork for years to come. There is no one realistic
set or set piece in the film. Everything is set for maximum exposure.
The special effects have that strange cartoon look that most rushed CGI
effects have. There are homage thrown in by Dykstra and his team to Gene
Warren and his work on "The Time Machine" (the growing plant scene) but
these scenes are so wroth with glaring color and art that they are
almost obscured.
Joel Schumacher has directed the film with no flair. Camera angles are
poorly chosen rehashing set ups from the old TV series. Master shots
pepper the action scenes, destroying any flow of kinetic quality they
may have had. Mr. Schumacher is a good Director. One just has to look
back on the films "The Lost Boys", "Cousins" (an underrated film) and
"The Client" to know that. But "Batman and Robin" comes off as a mated
made for TV movie. The film has no style of individuality. It is the
cinematic equivalent to Jell-O, pretty to look at, but empty.
It is unfortunate that this film, even with it's surprisingly strong box
office has succeeded in doing what Warner's thought Tim Burton would do
with the franchise. Kill it.
Joel Schumacher's "BATMAN & ROBIN" is loud, colorful, action packed, and
ultimately.. boring.
* out of ***** stars.

Title
Review for Payback (1999)
Paramount Pictures presents an ICON production of a Brian Helgeland film
Mel Gibson  "PAYBACK" Deborah Unger   David Paymer  Bill Duke
Kris Kristofferson   Edited by Kevin Stitt    Music by Chris Boardman
Executive Producer:  Stephen McEveety   Cinematography by Ericson Core
Based on the novel "The Hunter" by Donald E. Westlake
Screenplay by Brian Helgeland & Terry Hayes
Produced by Bruce Davey    Directed by Brian Helgeland
"We made a deal: if she'd stop hooking, I'd stop shooting people. I guess
we were both aiming a little high."
That ending bit of narration sums up the problems of Brian Helgeland's
directorial debut "Payback". In attempting to make an audience friendly
version of Donald Westlake's hard hitting crime novel 'The Hunter'; the
filmmakers have replaced the amoral atmosphere of the story and replaced it
with a quick series of quips and one liners. The end result is a very
brutal and strangely enjoyable film, but one that raises interesting
questions.
Mel Gibson plays Porter a small time hood who we meet as he is having
several bullets removed from his back  by a back alley doctor. In flashback
we learn that Porter and his partner, Val (Gregg Henry) steal $140 from a
Chinese gangster. Getting away with the money, Porter is doublecrossed by
Lynn (Deborah Unger), his wife and Val. As Porter lies bleeding from his
gunshot wounds, Val drops a photograph on Porter, revealing the hood with a
high priced call girl, Rosie (Maria Bello) he was employed by as a driver.
Porter is now on a mission, and that mission is not revenge. He simply is
out to get what is his. What he earned. $70 thousand dollars. And no one is
going to stop him from getting it. After healing his wounds, Porter finds
his ex-wife (widow), Lynn in a flea bag apartment. Strung out on heroin,
Lynn is returning home with her fix, when Porter surprises her from inside.
He violently assaults her, angry at the betrayal but more so with her
addiction. He forces Lynn to lay with him as she suffers the beginning of
withdrawals.
Unfortunately, as Porter sleeps, Lynn manages to get to her fix. When
Porter wakens, he finds Lynn dead from an overdose, the syringe still
imbedded in her artery.
Having gotten some information from Lynn, Porter goes off to find Val. His
source is Stegman (David Paymer), a mousy bookie. Stegman, happens to be
working with two of Chicago's not so finest cops, Detective Hicks and Leary
(Bill Duke and Jack Conley respectively) who determine that Porter must be
in for a big score and decide to cut themselves in on the deal. Add to this
mix, the reappearance of the Chinese hoods who were the victims of the
original heist, and the deck is increasingly stacked against Porter.
Until, that is, he is reacquainted with Rosie (Maria Bello).
"Payback" is an extremely ugly film. There is not one character that is
redeemable. Everyone in this film connives, cheats, kills, tortures and
maims anyone who would get in the way of their money. While this character
trait is base at best, the writers of the script try to humanize these
figures by giving them humorous asides and quick little one liners. It
doesn't work. While the film has humorous moments (this could be the
blackest comedy of all time were it not so imaginatively bright), there is
not one believable character in the film. The story is constructed with a
heavy reliance on a voice over narration in the person of Porter. In some
cases the narration is current, emphasizing a current thought or feeling,
others are spoken in a past tense which leads one to believe that the film
is being told in hindsight. This is one of the many problems with the film,
in that it's hard to feel empathy and suspense for the character when he is
telling you what he is going to do or what his mindset is, before he acts.
First time Director Brian Helgeland, does a very good job of handling this
morale of Mickey Spillane and Raymond Chandler. The basis for the story was
the marvelous  tome, "The Hunter" by Donald E. Westlake, which was filmed
once before as "Point Blank" (1967) with Lee Marvin in the title role. A
comparison of the two films is rather mote at this point, since both films
detail certain morays and cultural identities of their era. What Director
Helgeland is able to do with this current version is make a hip, jovial and
frightening violent portrait of American society collapsing onto itself in
a vile heap of easy money. At this level, "Payback" works as a lurid
magnifying glass. These characters care less about each other than what
they have. Possession is everything. This is pointed out most strongly in a
stomach churning scene of torture, in which Mel Gibson's character has his
toes crushed one by one with a  hammer until he reveals the location of a
kidnap victim. He lies! His health, his well-being is never so important as
his money.
Gibson's performance is topnotch as usual. In what may be the flip side of
his 'Lethal Weapons' character of Riggs, Porter has no affinity for anyone.
In one marvelously constructed scene, Porter asks Rosie why she didn't
leave with him the night they discovered they were in love with one
another. She replies, 'why didn't you take me'?  It shows that these
characters are so immersed in their own guilt and longing that they can
never express they're true feelings or, better yet come to grips with them.
The female leads are fine but are not called upon to do much. To that
extent Deborah Unger fairs the best, having the showier role as Porter's
estranged wife. Her portrayal for a woman at the end of hope is painful to
watch. When Porter comes to get information from her, she asks "Are you
going to kill me?" When Porter replies 'No', she is heartbroken, knowing
that her only salvation is to take her own life.
The standout performance is by Lucy Alexis Liu as the sadistic prostitute,
Pearl. Having developed a reputation for comic timing on the television
series "Ally McBeal", Ms. Liu pulls out all the stops in what may be the
most outrageous performance of the year. Her natural sexiness and comedic
ability raise her scenes to a level that the rest of the film fails to live
up to.
The cinematography by Ericson Core is marvelously conceived and staged.
This is one of the first films is quite a while that actually takes full
advantage of the wide screen. There are scenes, stage in such a way that
both extreme ends of the frame are used. This is going to be one film that
will not translate well to video without the aid of letterboxing.
One side note.. I must make a comment here about the conditions in which I
witnessed the film. On opening night at a local AMC theater. The print was
not in good shape. The color for the first two reels (approx. 40 mins.) was
uniformly dull, with muted color. Also the print developed a slight
greenish tint, almost eliminating any solid red or warm colors.
Furthermore, the print exhibited a problematic focus shift on the right
edge of the screen, where everything went out of focus. And lastly, the
print exhibited several instances of water damage. These showed themselves
as faint, dark horizontal lines that would run down the frame during a
scene. Needless to say, a refund was forthcoming.
But, that aside. What is the final determination of  "Payback". For my
taste, an interesting misfire. This is a film that could have been a
marvelous send up of the crime genre. As it is, it is a nice programmer.
But with a real moral compass to guide it. The film ultimately fails to
achieve its end. And that is, to entertain.
On a scale of 1 to 5, Payback rates 2.
(rated R for sexual situations, profanity, and extreme violence)
Copyright 1999 R.L. Strong
Nothing in this article may be quoted or
re-printed
without the expressed written permission of the author

Title
Review for Iron Giant, The (1999)
WARNER BROTHERS PRESENTS  A BRAD BIRD ANIMATED FILM  "THE IRON GIANT"  FEATURING
THE VOICE TALENTS OF  JENNIFER ANISTON  ELI MARIENTHAL  HARRY CONNICK JR.  VIN
DIESEL   CHRISTOPHER McDONALD   JAMES GAMMON JOHN MAHONNEY AND M. EMMET
WALSH       MUSIC BY MICHAEL KAMEN  EDITED BY DARREN T. HOLMES   ASSOCIATE
PRODUCER   JOHN WALKER   CINEMATOGRAPHY BY MARK DINICOLA   ART DIRECTION ALAN
BODNER   PRODUCTION DESIGN MARK WHITING EXECUTIVE PRODUCERS  PETE TOWNSHEND  &
JOHN WALKER   SCREENPLAY BY BRAD BIRD AND TIM McCANLIES BASED ON THE NOVEL AND
STAGE PLAY BY TED HUGHES   PRODUCED BY ALLISON ABBATE   DIRECTED BY BRAD BIRD
Animation! An art form that has been on a continuing ebb and flow in motion
picture history. Once solely the domain of Walt Disney, pen and ink drawings
have come back to many studios but not always with the same success. With the
release of Warner Bothers' "THE IRON GIANT", we have a chance to view a solid
piece of work that rivals anything done by the former.
The year is 1957, and all of American is aware and watching as Sputnik circles
the globe. But one night a meteorite bursts through our atmosphere, crashing
into the ocean off the coast of Maine. Earl Stutz (voiced by M. Emmet Walsh) is
fighting to stay afloat in his fishing boat as a rough storm tosses him.
Searching frantically for the lighthouse, he crashes into a huge monolith.
Looking up he sees something with two burning searchlights. Knocked of his boat
by a crashing wave, the old man is thrown into the sea. He wakens on the rocks
just below the lighthouse.
Hogarth Hughes is a nine-year-old boy, being raised by his single Mother, Annie
(Jennifer Aniston). Hogarth loves monster movies and comic (as most any kid
does), and is giving to telling tall tales to avoid punishments for poor
judgment. One night while watching a scary movie on television (against his
Mother's wishes), he hears a noise from outside. Suddenly the reception of the
television goes out. Hogarth runs to his bedroom, and looking out the window
discovers that the antenna has been broken off. He then sees large footprints
leading from his house into the forest. Thinking that an invasion from outer
space has begun, Hogarth grabs up his Space Cadet regalia and sets forth in
search of the invader.
Hogarth stumbles through the woods, following the trail of broken trees to an
electrical station. As he approaches, the ground starts to rumble, trembling
with heavy blows. Suddenly a huge 100 foot metallic man appears above the trees.
Hogarth runs, just avoiding being crushed by the giant's feet. The steel
behemoth stares down at the power station, eating first the security fence and
then trying to eat one of the power conduits. Electricity bolts out from all
directions. The giant falls back against the high-tension lines, becoming
entangled. The surge of electricity causes the giant to shake and shudder in
anguish. Hogarth cowers as the giant smokes and burns in the electrical storm.
Finally, feeling some sense of remorse, runs to the main cut off switch and
pulls the circuit closed. The giant falls back unconscious, crashing  to the
ground. Hogarth, frightened and amazed runs home to tell his Mother. Meeting her
at the edge of the forest, she scolds the boy for leaving home so late at night
and takes no heed of his tall tale.
The next morning, Hogarth returns to the forest in an effort to photograph the
giant. Waiting for long hours, sleep overcomes him. Finally Hogarth wakens and
finds that his bait (a sheet of corrugated steel) is missing. He turns to leave
and discovers the sheet of steel behind him. He slowly raises his gaze to see
the Iron Giant standing above him. Laid out nearby is the cut off switch from
the power plant. Hogarth realizes that the Giant understands the boy had rescued
him. Hogarth now has visions of being a super hero, and a secret friendship is
begun. And it's a secret that doesn't remain one for very long.
Director Brad Bird, who cut his teeth directing episodes of  'The Simpson' and
'King of the Hill' has produced one of the most enjoyable 'boys tales' ever to
grace the screen. His attention to detail is wondrously complete. The character
designs are both charming and engaging to a degree that we haven't seen since
the classic shorts by Chuck Jones. In fact the whole design of the film could be
seen as a loving tribute to the style and wit of Chuck Jones and Bob Clampett.
The script by Bird and Tim McCanlies is rich in both character and subtext.
There is an honest to goodness feel of the 1950's in this film that it almost
seems to be a product of that era and not a current production. That is not to
say that the animation is stilted or of poor quality. On the contrary, the
animation of "The Iron Giant" is some of the best animation we've ever seen
outside of the Disney Studios. The movements of all of the characters is finely
detailed and beautifully controlled, but never in a way that makes one forget
they are watching animation. The idea of realistic movement is not the point
here. But great character animation and detail to expressions and design are.
The inclusion of Computer animation is so seamless as to be (at times) confused
with the traditional methods. A wonderful and charming alliance or technology
and art.
The cast assembled for the voices of the characters are all remarkable deft at
portraying they're parts. Most effective are Harry Connick Jr. as the beatnik /
junkyard artist Dean McCoppin. His delivery of his lines is so on target that
you forget the actor and absorb the character he portrays. Kudos as well to
Christopher McDonald as Government Agent Kent Mansley, a performance as manic
and inspired as anything done by Mel Blanc. And too much cannot be said about
the performance of Eli Marienthal as Hogarth Hughes. The tone and nuance of this
performance is so on key that if the Academy ever decides to dedicates an award
to voice actors, Mr. Marienthal should surely be up for a nomination.
Based on the marvelous Children's Book "The Iron Giant" by the late Ted Hughes,
Brad Bird's adaptation is a rich and enthralling film. Full of rich animation
and characterization, along with strong moral questions about friendship and
identity. And there is so much depth to the film that adults can take away as
much, if not more from the viewing, as any child can. Absolutely one of the
summer's best surprises, as well as one of this years best films.
On a scale of one to five, 'The Iron Giant' rates full five stars. A wonderful
film that will continue to entertain and enchant both young and old alike, for
years to come. Absolutely, a Classic!
Copyright Š 1999 R. L. Strong
Nothing in this article may be quoted or re-printed without the expressed
written permission of the author.
--
Visit the Dungeon:
The Dungeonmaster's Cornucopia of Film
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Makeup/5594/reviews/main.html

Title
Review for Feng yun (1998)
GOLDEN HARVEST PRESENTS A BOB & PARTNERS COMPANY LTD.
PRODUCTION IN ASSOCIATION WITH CENTRO DIGITAL PICTURES LTD.
AN ANDREW LAU FILM  
AARON KWOK   EKIN CHENG    SONNY CHIBA
"THE STORM RIDERS"
CHRISTIE YEUNG   SHU CHI    MICHAEL TSE   LAI YU-HUNG
SPECIAL APPEARANCE BY ANTHONY WONG   
PRODUCED BY RAYMOND CHOW &  MANFRED WONG
EXECUTIVE PRODUCER LIU FUNG PING & JOHN CHU
CO-PRODUCER  JESSINTA LIU
DIRECTOR OF PHOTOGRAPHY ANDREW LAU (HKSC) 
VISUAL EFFECTS PRODUCED BY CENTRO DIGITAL PICTURES LTD.
BASED ON THE ORIGINAL STORIES BY MA WING SHING 
SCREENPLAY BY MANFRED WONG
DIRECTED BY ANDREW LAU
"When the Wind and Cloud combine, the fish with Golden Scales will become a
Dragon."
Intrigue, magic, spectacle, and mystery are spelled out by that tantalizing
prophecy which opens "THE STORM RIDERS" one of the recent arrivals from Hong
Kong. A marvelously inventive, visually stunning, and perplexing tale of
conquest and revenge.
The film opens with the arrival of the prophet Mud Buddha (Lai Yu-hung) to the
mountaintop palace of the Tin Ha Sect. It is there that Lord Conquer Hung Ba
(Sonny Chiba) receives the prophecy and the means with which to ensure his
mastery of the martial world. Using birth charts, Lord Conquer raids the
villages in an effort to locate the two children whose names are Wind and Cloud.
After killing their families, Lord Conquer makes apostles of the children making
them part of his inner circle along with his own son Frost.
As the children grow up into men, the Tin Ha Sect has decimated most of China,
plundering its riches and people. Lord Conquer proves to be an unholy and evil
man, interested only in his fame and wealth. Having collected the swords from
all of his enemies except for the famed Ultimate Sword created by master
swordmaker, Nip Yan-wong (Yu Wong-Guang), Cloud's father. Now conflict comes as
the two adopted boys both fall in love with Lord Conquer's Daughter, Charity.
After ten years of success, Lord Conquer grows anxious. Wanting to know what his
future holds, he orders his three warriors to find Mud Buddha, to force the seer
to reveal the final part of his prophecy. When he learns that Wind and Cloud
will bring about the downfall his empire, the evil Lord conspires to turn the
two men against one another, by forcing his daughter, Charity to marry one of
them.
Director Andrew Lau has constructed a marvelously striking fantasy  in 'THE
STORM RIDERS' (Cantonese Title: 'Feng yun' ). What makes the film perplexing is
simple that some of the Chinese inter-titles are not translated, making the
relationship between some of the characters difficult to identify. This problem
aside, the film is remarkably entertaining and engrossing. Lau, serving as his
own Cinematographer, frames every scene for maximum emotional impact. There are
scenes here of extraordinary composition and beauty. Add to that the
spectacularly vivid computer generated effects, and the film takes on the epic
quality of a biblical drama.
The framing of the scenes are based on the panels of a comic or graphic novel.
Camera angles are rarely straight ahead. The film, while violent and action
packed is never grotesque. Scenes of violence have a joyous roller coaster ride
vitality to them, incorporating some marvelously inventive effects, both visual
and physical. There are scenes here of jaw dropping inventiveness and beauty.
The Wow! Factor is in great abundance. While the choreography of the martial
arts on display are in the traditional method of Hong Kong filmmaking, the
addition of the fantasy element and the visual effects, display a marvelous joy
and verve. The only western comparison that comes to mind is Director John
Carpenter's unfairly maligned "Big Trouble in little China"(1986).
The plotting of the film is troublesome. The story, being base on a series of
popular comics in Hong Kong is understandably episodic. While it is certain that
most Hong Kong viewers will understand and recognize all of these characters,
Westerners may have a hard time pulling all of these intricacies together.
Nevertheless, "The Storm Riders"  still entertains simple on it's own verve and
sense of wonder.
The performances are all two dimensional, which is to be expected in such a
fairy tale. The sole false note comes from lead Arron Kwok as Cloud is much too
brooding, coming off as a petulant child rather than a man bent on revenge.
Nevertheless, the performance does give the film a needed center and focus, as
it is Cloud's determination to one day take revenge against his master for the
death of his father.
The standout performance of the film is without a doubt the re-doubtable Sonny
Chiba. His turn as Lord Conquer is a fine, scene-stealing tip of the hat to
Toshiro Mufune. His performance is full of mad posturing and grand gestures,
truly fitting a whu-shu performance. Best known for his 'Streetfighter' series
of films (when released in the U.S. in 1974, the film was summarily given an X
rating by the Motion Picture Ratings Board). Mr. Chiba pulls out all of the
classic stops in giving Lord Conquer a full degree of madness and ego.
The sound design of the film is equally stunning. Recorded in sync sound
(recorded live) in the native Hong Kong dialect of Cantonese, 'The Storm Riders'
has one of the most luscious soundtracks recorded. The sound effects are
stunning and deafening. If you get a chance to see this film on the big screen,
do so. The second best option is the vibrant DVD released earlier this year by
Universe Laser & Video (a Hong Kong video company).
In closing, with Hong Kong's film industry in danger of being devoured by the
video pirates, it's a shame that films such as 'The Storm Riders' may never be
made again. I can only hope that this does not happen. Made on a meager budget
of $10 million dollars (U.S. equivalent), the film looks and feels like it cost
six times that much.
On a scale of 1 to 5, "THE STORM RIDERS" rates a raging 4. Grand entertainment
for those adventurous enough to seek it out. The film has no MPAA rating, but
should be considered a PG-13. Cantonese language with English subtitles. 128
minutes running time. Panavision (scope-wide screen).
Copyright 1999 R. L Strong
All rights reserved Nothing in this article may be quoted or re-printed without
the express written permission of the author.

Title
Review for Mummy, The (1999)
UNIVERSAL PICTURES PRESENTS AN ALPHAVILLE PRODUCTION
OF A STEPHEN SOMMERS FILM
BRENDAN FRASER  "THE MUMMY" 
RACHEL WEISZ  JOHN HANNAH ARNOLD VOSLOO   JONATHAN HYDE  KEVIN J. O'CONNOR
SPECIAL VISUAL EFFECTS AND ANIMATION BY INDUSTRIAL LIGHT & MAGIC
MUSIC BY JERRY GOLDSMITH   
CO-PRODUCER PATRICIA CARR   
FILM EDITOR BOB DUCSAY
PRODUCTION DESIGNER ALLAN CAMERON   
DIRECTOR OF PHOTOGRAPHY ADRIAN BIDDLE B.S.C.
EXECUTIVE PRODUCER KEVIN JARRE   
PRODUCED BY JAMES JACKS &  SEAN DANIEL
SCREEN STORY BY STEPHEN SOMMERS AND LLOYD FONVIELLE & KEVIN JARRE
SCREENPLAY BY STEPHEN SOMMERS   
DIRECTED BY STEPHEN SOMMERS
Universal Pictures, once was the bastion of the Horror genre. Such
venerable American icons as the Frankenstein Monster, Count Dracula,
Lawrence Talbot, the Wolfman, and in the 50's, The Creature; have
scared and endeared themselves to the movie going public. One of
Universal Pictures most maligned creations, Karis, the Mummy; was
relegated to the moderate level of 'B' picture. Having no other
purpose that to come back to life to aid a conniving Egyptian Priest
in his attempt to preserve their riches. All this while Karis himself
tried vainly to recapture the reincarnated Princess Annunka. While
these films were enjoyable programmers, they were never considered
classics and rightly so. The only film to gather any notoriety was the
original 1932 version of "The Mummy" which stared the venerable Boris
Karloff in the role of the dreaded Imhotep. In this new appraisal of
the classic tale, Director Stephen Sommers has created a sometimes
amusing, but mostly barren piece of fluff.
In a nicely constructed prologue, we witness the murder of the Pharaoh
by his Mistress, Anck-Su-Namun and her lover, the high Priest
Imhotep. Imhotep's lover sacrifices herself so that the Priest can
escape and through his magic, return her spirit to her
body. Unfortunately, the Pharaoh's guard interrupt the proceeding and
mummify the Priest in a dreaded procedure that has Imhotep buried
alive in a sarcophagus full of flesh eating beetles.
Flash forward to the 1920's. Rick O'Connell (Brendan Frazer) is
fighting off an army of unidentified Arabian fighters. As the army
decimates his men, O'Connell outruns the hordes until a huge statue
corners him. His pursuers suddenly turn and run away. O'Connell turns
and sees that he is standing beneath the statue of Anubis, the resting
place of Imhotep. The sands move and erupt, taking on the appearance
of the dreaded Priest, threatening to swallow O'Connell. He escapes
and wanders the desert. Finally captured and placed in a Moroccan
jail, he waits for his execution.
To his rescue, comes Evelyn (Rachel Weisz) and her brother Jonathan
(John Hannah), who discover that O'Connell may know the location of
the fabled city of the dead, Hamunaptra. The expedition
begins. O'Connell and Evelyn develop an uneasy romantic relationship,
as they uncover Imhotep's tomb. Unfortunately, another troupe of
treasure hunters led by actor Jonathan Hyde, follows them.  Finding
the tomb, Imhotep is released from his slumber and proceeds to murder
those who opened his crypt, taking their organs for his own
use. Imhotep soon kidnaps Evelyn to use as a sacrifice to the old
Egyptian gods, in preparation to brining his beloved Anck-Su-Namun
back to live.
The plot, as described above is pretty much, all there is to the
film. There are several other developments and sequences that deserve
attention, but they are of fleeting entertainment value. Suffice to
say that, there are moments of good fun in this film, but not enough
to warrant the 124 minute running time. At this length, the film seems
overly long. The script is wont with contrivances and plot holes. Once
Imhotep starts to wander about Egypt, the special effects take center
stage. While there are some very good visuals in the film, I had the
strange feeling that I was actually watching an old Charles Schneer
production.  Scenes of the computer generated mummy, it's skeleton
visible through sections of it's anatomy (imagine the Aurora model kit
of Grey's Anatomy, with some gauze raped around it and you'll get the
picture). Unfortunately, I kept being reminded of Ray Harryhausen's
Dynamation effects, rather than any sort of dread that these scenes
may have had. While the effects are quiet enjoyable and stunning, they
don't have that fission , that 'oh my gosh!' quality that drives this
kind of picture.
The performances are nothing special in the film. Brendan Fraser does
an okay job of filling in the matinee idol part. He fills the 'Indian
Jones' role quite well in fact. Mr. Fraser is one of those rare actors
that seems to enjoy the absurdity of the project he is involved in. A
refreshingly joyous quality.  However, his climatic fight with horde
of mummified warriors introduces lots of Hong Kong Wu-Shu type martial
arts, which are completely incongruous with his character and the
setting. I don't think most westerners had the opportunity to study
under the Shaolin monks at that time in history. But, this is a
fantasy, so it's forgivable to an extent.
Rachel Weisz brings to her character of Evelyn a nice dry wit. Her
comic timing is very refreshing. Moreover in a film being marketed as
a horror / adventure, the character should be a least a little
frightened. John Hannah as Evelyn's brother, Jonathan is completely
wasted. His character does nothing but whine and comment on the
proceedings, only occasionally getting involved in the action.  One of
the most interesting and ultimately most frustrating casting notes in
the film is the inclusion of Bernard Fox as the aging and slightly mad
Corporal Wilson. The character brings a welcome bit of comic relief to
the film that is not derived from the constant one-liners and
slapstick situations that abound in the film. Unfortunately, the
character is used solely as a device in which to get the characters to
their destination after which, he is conveniently killed off.
Kevin O'Connor is creepily amusing in his part of the cowardly,
Beni. His confrontation with Imhotep, wherein he tries to protect
himself from the approaching monster by holding up several holy
artifacts he wares around his neck. When he finally holds up the Star
of David, Imhotep recognizes the symbol as belonging to the Slaves of
his time, and takes the former guide as his accomplice promising him
untold riches. Unfortunately, Mr. O'Connor is afforded much too much
screen time, and consequently, the character becomes less and less
threatening, finally ending as a buffoon.
Arnold Vosloo is actually quiet good in the role of the re-constituted
Priest Imhotep. Having appeared opposite Lance Henrickson in John
Woo's "Hard Target" and the two 'Darkman' sequels, Vosloo carries with
him an appropriate air of menace and stature that are a welcome
benefit to the film. Vosloo is a natural screen villain. His charisma
is that good.
The script for "The Mummy" is comic book from start to finish. While
there is nothing wrong with that, what the script lacks is a sense of
dread that any horror film needs to have. All the adventure and action
in the world has no value without a sense of danger. Since none of the
characters express any sense of jeopardy, it is hard to feel involved
in the proceedings. While the film is enjoyably kinetic, it would have
benefited from a little more suspense and less visual buffoonery.
Also, there are the dreaded instances of contrivance throughout the
film. The inclusion of the flesh eating beetles as part of the
mummification process in the prologue of the film is a nice and creepy
touch. Yet having the pests remain alive after 3000 years of
starvation (not much to chow on in a sealed crypt), is a bit of a
stretch.  Furthermore, these beetles continue to crawl all over
Imhotep after he starts to replace his organs, the bugs crawling in
and out of his flesh. Why these bugs just don't eat the darn guy up
again is something that I cannot explain. A quick thanks should also
go to the prop managers who managed to leave a convenient assortment
of camels at the tomb for our heroes to escape on when the entire city
of the dead collapses in on itself.
As it stands, "THE MUMMY" is a fun time waster. There is nothing in
the film that will linger after you've left the theater. And the
possibility of a franchise is moot at best. It should be mentioned
that there are scenes of a grotesque nature in the film that may not
be acceptable for younger viewers. The PG-13 rating is an accurate
one.
Copyright Š 1999 R. L. Strong Nothing in this article may be reproduced or
altered in any way without the expressed written permission of the author..

Title
Review for Hsing hsing wang (1977)
ROLLING THUNDER PICTURES & COWBOY BOOKING INTERNATIONAL PRESENTS A SHAW BROTHERS
PRODUCTION   A HO MENG-HUA FILM   "MIGHTY PEKING MAN"
EVELYNE KRAFT  DANNY LEE
EDITED BY CHIANG SING-LUNG  
ORIGINAL MUSIC BY CHEN YUNG-YU & DeWOLFE 
EXECUTIVE PRODUCER  CHENG PANG 
DIRECTOR OF PHOTOGRAPHY  TSAO HUI-CHI, WU CHO-HUA
DIRECTOR OF VISUAL EFFECTS  TEISHO ARIKAWA    
PRODUCED BY  CHUA LAM, RUNME SHAW, VEE KING SHAW  
SCREENPLAY BY I. KUENG  
DIRECTED BY HO MENG-HUA
The ground rumbles and quakes. But only in the background, as the
natives of an Indian jungle scatter before the set in front of the
front projection screen starts to puff forth clouds of smoke and dust
and break apart. Suddenly, the camera starts to shake violently.
Welcome to the wonderfully trite world of "THE MIGHTY PEKING MAN"
being re-released by Quentin Tarantino's Rolling Thunder Pictures
outfit onto the midnight circuit. Originally released by a small New
York outfit, World Northal Films in 1978 as "Goliathon" was anything
but a hit both here and in it's native Hong Kong back in 1977. So why
bring the film back? Well, for the obvious reason being that any film
this adorably bad has to be seen.
Our story opens with the earthquake releasing a 100-foot tall missing
link. He terrorizes the natives and becomes a local myth. In 1977, a
local promoter, Lu Tiem (Ku Feng ) decides to investigate the legend,
in an attempt to capture the big beast and put him on display.  He is
told that the best explorer for the job is Johnny Feng (Danny Lee,
best known for his role in John Woo's 'The Killer'). Danny is drunk
and despondent, having discovered his wife having an affair with his
brother, so Danny has no qualms about packing up for the jungles of
India.
Once in the jungle, the team is besieged by an assortment of
dangers. A stampede of elephants, an attack of a very drugged tiger,
and assorted other misfortunes.  Finally, Lu Tiem turns his back on
Johnny, leaving him for dead. Johnny is rescued by Samantha (Evelyne
Kraft), a vivacious female Tarzan. Samantha has survived in the jungle
after the crash of her parent's plane when she was a child. Now
fully-grown and wearing a leather bikini (which threatens to fall off
throughout the film), Samantha nurses Johnny back to good health, with
the help of her protector, The Mighty Peking.
Johnny and Samantha soon start to become attracted to one another, and
their life in the jungle is idyllic. Samantha has not only grown into
a beautiful woman, but has developed a nurturing relationship with the
animals of the jungle. She wrestles with snakes, plays with large
beaked birds, and carries a leopard on her shoulders.
But Johnny grows tired of paradise and convinces Samantha to come with
him back to Hong Kong. She agrees, and the two of them set off for the
big city.  Unfortunately, Peking Man follows.  When the three of them
arrive in Hong Kong, Mighty Peking Man is captured and put on display,
showing off his strength to the amusement of the local populace.
Back in Hong Kong, Johnny is confronted by his estranged wife.  She
confesses her indiscretion, pleading with him to take her back. As
Johnny makes love to his wife, Samantha bursts into the
room. Heartbroken, Samantha runs to the stadium where the promoters
are tormenting The Peking Man. Pleadings with the promoters to release
the giant, Lu Tiem hits her. Peking Man summarily breaks out of his
cage and goes on a rampage throughout Tokyo (?) , sorry Hong Kong
until he is killed by the military. Johnny returns to Samantha's side
proclaiming his love for her and asking for her forgiveness. The two
lovers return to the jungle to live happily ever after.
There I've spoiled the whole thing for you. Don't believe that for a
minute. The plot of "Mighty Peking Man" is only one of its cheesy
pleasures. It's not that this film is unremittingly bad, it's just
that the earnestness involved does not always translate to the
screen. But the effort is so profoundly goofy that one can't help but
be drawn into the film. This is the perfect group night out feature. A
movie that cries out to be talked back to and laughed with.
There are some scenes that caused me some reservation, even
despair. The noticeably drugged leopard and tiger in the film are
painfully used as props. No concern for their well being is evidenced,
as the animals visibly labor to breathe. But, when one has to carry a
200 pound leopard on one's shoulder's and spin it around like your
little brother, I guess narcotics would be a necessity.  Still, those
scenes brought the film to a dead stop for me.
Some of the scenes with Evelyne Kraft as Samantha are just hilarious
to watch.  Not because of her performance, but due to the attention
she and her bikini cause. During the sequence where She and Johnny
leave the jungle for the city, the terrified villagers are to busy
staring at Evelyne to react properly to the attack of Mighty Peking
Man on their village. The sight of grown men in black face (yes, this
film is dreadfully not politically correct), screaming in fear at a
giant ape man while their eyes are fixed on Samantha's posterior, is
riotously amusing.
Director HO MENG-HUA has had a long career in Hong Kong films but
nothing could top this triumph of silliness and ineptitude. The
performances are nothing to write home about. But Evelyne Kraft exudes
a charm and innocents that is keeping with tone of the film. It's her
presents that makes the film work. And that bikini isn't a bad
attraction either. The special effects by TEISHO ARIKAWA are on a
level with the Godzilla films of the early 1970's and have a charm
that is hard to resist. While Peking Man is nothing more than a
stuntman in a hirsute with a mask on, there is something refreshing
about the presentation. A hand made quality, lacking from today's CGI
heavy films. No, there's not a once of believability here. But charm,
it has. The charms of a cheap plastic toy that we remember from our
childhood, but charm just the same.
On a scale of 1 to 5, "MIGHTY PEKING MAN" rates a 3. This is an
audience participation film, along the lines of 'Rocky Horror" (which
I dislike), or any other midnight movie. A party movie, but not one to
watch on your own. That, I cannot recommend.
Copyright 1999 R. L Strong
All rights reserved Nothing in this article may be quoted or re-printed without
the express written permission of the author.

Title
Review for Almost Famous (2000)
DREAMWORKS PICTURES AND COLUMBIA PICTURES PRESENTS
A VINYL PICTURES PRODUCTION  OF  A CAMERON CROWE FILM
"ALMOST FAMOUS"   BILLY CRUDUP   FRANCES McDORMAND   KATE HUDSON
JASON LEE   PATRICK FUGIT   ANNA PAQUIN   FARUZA BALK   NOAH TAYLOR and
PHILIP SEYMOUR HOFFMAN
MUSIC SUPERVISOR  DANNY BRAMSON   SCORE BY NANCY WILSON
EXECUTIVE PRODUCERS  MARTY P. EWING   SCOTT M. MARTIN   STEVEN P. SAETA
EDITED BY  MARTIN APPLEBAUM
DIRECTOR OF PHOTOGRAPHY JOHN TOLL
PRODUCED BY CAMERON CROWE  IAN BRYCE
WRITTEN AND DIRECTED BY CAMERON CROWE
The 1970's were a time of passage for a lot of us. Cruising with our
friends, going out on our first date, and learning the ins and outs of
too many vices were all part of that passage. Not all of us experienced
the same things. But one thing that we all did have in common and that
was Rock and Roll. Cameron Crowe, the writer of the seminal teen comedy
"Fast Times at Ridgemont High" and Writer, Director of the charming "Say
Anything" and "Jerry McGuire", give us a touching and humorous peon to
youth, love, and most importantly music.
William Miller (Patrick Fugit) is an intelligent young man of 15.
Already in his senior year of High School (thanks to his mother's
skipping two grades, claiming the school system is too limiting). Elaine
Miller (Frances McDermont) is a college professor who is raising her
children on her own (William's father died when William was only 6).
Elaine's fear of modern society creates at atmosphere of repression
around the home, with drugs being the ultimate danger. This leads
William's sister, Anita (Zooey Deschanel) to leave home with her
boyfriend for California. In an effort to expand her little brother's
horizons, she leaves him her album collection, giving him strict
instructions to listen to The Who's "Tommy" with a candle burning, "and
you'll see your future".
William becomes fascinated with the music. Being a gifted child, he
starts to write. Soon he is submitting articles to national magazines
which leads to his meeting famed Cream Magazine critic, Lester Bangs
(Philip Seymour Hoffman). Bangs burned on the industry's homogenization
of music. But he is taken by Williams's innocents and creativity, so
offers the young man an assignment. Interview Black Sabbath and write a
700-word article about the band. William is excited and nervous as his
Mother drives him to the concert. Unable to get past security, Williams
befriends Penny Lane (Kate Hudson); leader of the famed Band Aid troop
of fans (groupies that claimed not to have sex with the bands) and the
band Sweetwater.
Russel Hammond (Billy Crudup) is taken by the young man and gives the
boy a chance at a new gig, interviewing Sweetwater and travelling with
them on their latest tour. This leads to William being approached by
Rolling Stone Magazine to cover the tour and write an inside piece on
the band.
Cameron Crowe is one of the best writers of characters and character
interplay working today. While not having a poetic style like David
Mamet, Crowe's characters speak with a personality and believability
that seems unscripted. This naturalness is most appealing here. All of
the characters are finely drawn and believable in their behavior and
attitudes. And that same quality leads to some very funny and
heartbreaking moments.
Patrick Fugit, in his first film steals the picture with his wide eyed
innocent portrayal of William. His passion for the music and the shear
joy in which he follows the band are just infectous. This is one of the
best debuts by an actor in years. This is a young actor to watch.
Frances McDermont is vivaciously droll as Elaine Miller. So concerned
with her son's upbringing, she constantly reminds him of the dangers of
drugs, while urging him to read the works of Poe, Isben, and Goethe. She
is a strong willed woman who loves her children but refuses to stand in
the way of their future. This is McDermont's best performance since
"Fargo" and is as touching and funny.
Of course, the real showcase performances of the film belong to Billy
Crudup and Kate Hudson. Billy Crudup as Russell Hammond, guitarist for
the band Sweetwater is a young adult dealing with his own fame and his
growing dissatisfaction with his band. His performance is charmingly
naďve. Here is a man who would just as well be sitting with a beer at a
house party, as he would work on his career. His is a funny, touching
and completely believable realization. And Kate Hudson is absolutely
charming as the love interest Penny Lane. Her love affair with Russell
and her growing affection for William is just a joy to watch. Again, the
naivete of the character is the most notable quality here. Hudson
manages to make Penny Lane both a silly little girl, dreaming of love
and trips to Monaco and a woman who knows that this life style is only
transitory and that her real life lies elsewhere.
The other cast members are all equally fine. In fact, I can't think of
another recent film as perfectly cast and performed as this one this
year. Most notably are, Jason Lee as Jeff Bebe (Sweetwater's lead
singer), to the other members of Band Aid, Anna Panquin as Polexia
Aphrodisia and Faruza Balk as Sapphire are all wonderfully crafted
performances. These are just damn good character performances, and while
never really center stage always remain in the periphery of the film,
adding just the right subtle touches of character and depth to bring
this film its believability.
And foremost throughout the film is the music. The section of songs
ranging from Lou Reed's "Waiting for the Man" to Led Zeppelin's
"Tangerine" is just marvelously chosen, rivaling the soundtrack to
Stephen Feares' "High Fidelity".  And the score by Nancy Wilson (of the
70's group Heart) is equally enjoyable in both its simplicity and its
detail. Wilson also penned two songs for the fictional band, Sweetwater
that will make audiences everywhere searching for more material from
this group.
At the close of the movie, both William and his Family have reconciled
and have grown into adults. And the film will have an equally marvelous
effect on those who see it. A film steeped in charm, nostalgia and joy
for a time when innocents was both painful and blissful, and nothing to
be looked down upon. "Almost Famous" is one of this years best films.
Š 2000 R.L. Strong
Nothing in this article may be copied or re-written without the
expressed permission of the author.
THE CORNUCOPIA OF FILM
http://www.geocities.com/rs080455

Title
Review for Mission to Mars (2000)
The realm of Science Fiction has always been an allegory of political
and or moral sensibilities. The best tales of the genre deal with
mankind's struggle for survival or knowledge. Such popular and
noteworthy tomes as "Stranger in a Strange Land" by Robert Heinlein,
"Childhood's End" by Arthur C. Clarke and "Man in the High Castle" and
"Do Androids Dream of Electric Sheep" by Philip K. Dick all deal with
man's need for identity and struggle for self worth.
Hollywood has regularly adapted the milieu (if not the message) of
Science Fiction since it's beginnings. Most films just created fancy
pulp tales with no more thought that the escapism they achieved. It
really wasn't until Producer George Pal, took charge of Robert
Heinlein's novel "Rocketship Galileo" and crafted the film
"Destination Moon", that 'Sci-Fi' (as it is commonly referred to),
came into it's own. From there, such diverse filmmakers as Roger
Corman to Stanley Kubrick, have sought to express ideas through the
medium of the genre. With the release of Touchstone Pictures "Mission
to Mars", we have an unabashedly nonchalant Sci-Fi film for those who
read The National Enquirer and The Globe.
The film opens on a summer barbecue, as Phil Ohlmyer (Jerry O'Connell)
woos a young female with his tales of space glory and the upcoming
mission. Woody Blake (Tim Robbins) and his wife Terri (Connie Nielsen)
commit to his coming authority on the mission, and Luc Goddard (Don
Cheadle) consoles his son.
Entering the party is Jim McConnell (Gary Sinise), who gave up command
of the mission due to the untimely death of his wife,  Maggie (Kim
Delaney). Luc consoles Jim with Woody's assistance. The three men are
friends and carry a fine bond of trust and caring between them. But
Jim still longs to set foot on the Red Planet.
The mission is in earnest as Luc and his team land in the Cydonia
region of Mars. They send out the rover to investigate the area and
discover what seems to be water or ice under the surface. Going out to
investigate, Luc and his team approach the famed 'Face on Mars'. A
strange noise emanates from the rock. As the team tries to scan
through the rock with radar, a violent wind storm erupts, creating a
vortex that kills all members of the team, save for Luc.
Back on the space station orbiting Earth, Woody and Jim receive the
information that the Mars landing team is missing. Luc's interference
laden emergency message urges the two men to attempt a second mission
to the red planet in the hopes of rescuing the previous team. The
second journey to the Martian world is fraught with danger. Meteorite
showers, explosions, and rescues all come into play as the intrepid
heroes make there way to the planet's surface. The big question is, is
there now or has there ever been intelligent life on Mars. And if so,
what is its relationship with us?
Now for the bad news. The entire plot of  "Mission to Mars" is based
almost wholeheartedly on outdated and preposterous National Enquirer
type Martian civilization tripe. The famed 'Face on Mars' becomes the
centerpiece of the film, revealing some of the most harebrained sci-fi
pabulum  the screen has witnessed. Borrowing ideas from such films as
"Robinson Crusoe on Mars" (1964), Quatermass and the Pit (1967),
"2001: A Space Odyssey", and even Mario Bava's "Planet of the
Vampires"('Terrore nello spazio') (1965), "Mission to Mars" is a
hodgepodge of ideas that don't add up to a satisfying whole.
While some sequences are wonderfully handled and executed, the film
remains flat and un-involving. So much time is giving to establishing
the lead characters in the film, but to no good use. The performances
are all workmen like, with only Don Cheadle (as Luc) carrying any sort
of real chemistry. Gary Sinise is wasted in role that requires him to
look as if he is experiencing sleep depravation. And the mistaken idea
of having Jerry O'Connell (as Phil Ohlmyer) play his part for comic
relief is just too painful to excuse. And the less said about Tim
Robbins called in from home performance the better. He's just having
too much fun here to give a damn.
The script has a few lapses, namely that after discovering several
breaches in the hull of the ship caused by a meteorite shower, no one
thinks of checking the fuel tanks or the remainder of the ship for
damage. This of course leads to our heroes having to abandon their
rescue ship. Also, when one character sacrifices himself,  the
character takes on a religious demeanor that is completely at odds
with the situation.
But the biggest offence in the film is the horrid, intrusive score by
Ennio Morricone. Subtlety is non-existent here. In fact in some scenes
the music becomes so extravagant that dialogue is almost drowned out.
The only sequence in which the score almost works is during the
protracted meteorite shower.
The pacing of the film is very leisurely. After the opening
introduction of the characters (which lasts a full 22 minutes), we are
finally dropped onto the Martian surface. Then, there is another long
pause in the plot for more character development, including an
elaborate dance sequence in zero gravity. The film could lose about 30
minutes and actually gain some momentum. There are so many scenes of
talking heads, discussing what we already know is going to happen,
that it drags the film to a dead stop.
The good news is that the film is absolutely sumptuous to look at. The
vistas of the planet Mars are majestic and awe inspiring. The design
of the numerous spacecraft and suits are all expertly drafted, with a
level of realism that hasn't been seen since "2001: A Space Odyssey".
The visual effects are just stunning, from the space walk sequences,
to the visualization of evolution on Earth. The only fault come with
the Martians themselves, which look more like something out of a
plastic model kit than something from another world.
Director De Palma stages some wonderfully creative scenes through out
the film. The opening sequence alone in a seemingly un-interrupted cut
lasting almost 15 minutes (an homage' to Hitchcock's "Rope"), as we
are introduced to all of the characters. Scenes in the rescue ship,
with its rotating centrifuge, are just amazing in their execution. But
the nagging question, is the final explanation worth all of this Sturm
und Drang.
Sadly it is not.
Director Brian De Palma has crafted an extravagant production. The set
design and visual effects are all arresting. But it's the comic strip
denouncement that ruin what might have been a fine return to good
adventurous, thought provoking science fiction. A disappointing film,
but one that might still entertain if you can settle for the visuals.
Š 2000 R.L. Strong
www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Makeup/5594/reviews.main
